<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89929-0046 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-29-89.f2.A1045</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 188 / Friday, September 29, 1989/ Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Health Care Financing Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">42 CFR Parts 405, 412, and 413 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[BPD-375-F] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 0938 AC27 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Medicare Program; Changes in Payment Policy for Direct Graduate MedicalEducation Costs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Health Care Financing Administration (HCFA), HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> This rule sets forth changes in Medicare policy concerningpayment for the direct graduate medical education costs of providers associatedwith approved residency programs in medicine, osteopathy, dentistry, andpodiatry. These changes implement section 1886(h) of the Social SecurityAct, which was added by section 9202 of the Consolidated Omnibus BudgetReconciliation Act of 1985 and amended by section 9314 of the Omnibus BudgetReconciliation Act of 1986. Also, we are making a conforming change thataffects the indirect medical education payments of hospitals that becamesubject to the prospective payment system during the period October 1,1983 through December 31, 1983.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE:</T2> This final rule is effective</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">October 30, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION, CONTACT:</T2><ITAG tagnum="15">Barbara Wynn, (301) 966-4529.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Bernadette Schumaker (ESRD exception criteria), (301) 966-4568.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2> <ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>Medicare has historically paid a share of the net cost of approved medicaleducation activities. Our regulations at 42 CFR 413.85(b) currently defineapproved educational activities to mean formally organized or planned programsof study usually engaged in by providers in order to enhance the qualityof care in an institution. These activities include approved training programsfor physicians, nurses, and certain paramedical health professionals (sometimesreferred to as allied health professionals), for example, physical therapists.The allowable costs of these activities include the direct costs of salariesand fringe benefits of interns and residents, salaries attributable tothe supervisory time of teaching physicians, other teachers' salaries,and the indirect costs (that is, institutional overhead, for example, employeehealth and welfare benefits) that are appropriately allocated to the particularmedical education cost center.The Medicare program has shared in the costs of approved medical educationactivities, as defined above, on a reasonable cost basis. Section 1861(v)(1)(A)of the Social Security Act (the Act) defines reasonable cost as the costactually incurred, excluding any cost unnecessary in the efficient deliveryof needed health services to Medicare beneficiaries. Section 413.85 ofthe regulations further specifies that the allowable cost of approved educationalactivities is the net cost, which is determined by deducting tuition revenuesfrom total costs. Under sections 1886 (a)(4) and (d)(1)(A) of the Act, and andSection; 412.113of the regulations, direct medical education costs are excluded from thedefinition of operating costs and, accordingly, are not included in thecalculation of payment rates under the prospective payment system for inpatienthospital services or in the calculation of the target amount for hospitalsexcluded from the prospective payment system and subject to the rate-of-increaseceiling. These costs are separately identified and ``passed-through,''that is, paid on a reasonable cost basis. We also note that section 1886(d)(5)(B) of the Act and andSection; 412.115(b)of our regulations specify that hospitals with ``indirect costs of medicaleducation'' will receive an additional payment amount under the prospectivepayment system. As used in section 1886(d)(5)(B) of the Act, ``indirectcosts of medical education'' means those additional operating (that is,patient care) costs incurred by hospitals with graduate medical educationprograms. The indirect costs of medical education might, for example, includeadded costs resulting from an increased number of tests ordered by residentsas compared to the number of tests normally ordered by more experiencedphysicians. (For the regulations governing the determination of indirectmedical education costs, see andSection; 412.118.) Generally, except for hospitals whose first cost reporting period beganduring the period October 1, 1983 through December 31, 1983, this rulewill not apply to indirect medical education payments. It also will notapply to the costs of approved nursing and allied health training programs.It will apply only to the costs associated with approved medical, osteopathic,dental, and podiatric residency programs as currently governed by andSection;413.85. We are adding a new andSection; 413.86 that will govern approvedmedical, osteopathic, dental, and podiatric residency programs. In orderto avoid confusion, we use the term ``direct graduate medical educationcosts'' to refer to the costs of the activities governed by the new andSection;413.86. We are also making conforming changes to andSection; 413.85. However,none of these changes represents policy changes with regard to the reasonablecost reimbursement of approved nursing and paramedical training programs.This rule will apply to direct graduate medical education (GME) costs inall hospitals and hospital-based providers and subproviders. Although providersother than hospitals may participate in approved GME programs that Medicaresupports, the majority of these programs are concentrated in hospitalsand health care complexes. The latter are complexes that include, in additionto a hospital, subproviders such as psychiatric units and other hospital-basedproviders such as skilled nursing facilities or home health agencies. Theallowable costs of GME on which the per resident amounts established bythis rule are based include GME costs attributable to nonhospital portionsof a health care complex. These costs are not separable in such a manneras to permit per resident amounts based exclusively on the GME costs ofthe hospital. For example, it would not be unusual for a resident in familypractice to see patients in both the acute care portion of a hospital andin the hospital-based skilled nursing facility on his or her daily rounds.To require a tracking of a resident's time in each entity of the hospitalcomplex would not be practical. In this document, for ease of reference, we will use the term hospitalto refer to the institutions to which this rule applies, that is, bothhospitals and hospital-based providers and subproviders. A. The July 1985 Final Rule In a final rule published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4> on July 5, 1985 (50 FR 27722), we modified andSection;413.85 (formerly andSection; 405.421(a)(2) but redesignated on September30, 1986 (51 FR 34790)) to revise our method of paying for allowable directmedical education costs by imposing a 1-year limit on these costs. Underthat final rule, for cost reporting periods beginning on or after July1, 1985 but before July 1, 1986, a provider's allowable direct medicaleducation costs were to have been limited, under the authority of section186(v)(1)(A) of the Act, to the lesser of the provider's actual cost ofits program or programs for that particular cost reporting period or theprovider's allowable costs incurred during a base period (the provider'scost reporting period that began on or after October 1, 1983 but beforeOctober 1, 1984). B. Public Law 99-272 Section 9202 of the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985(Pub. L. 99-272) enacted on April 7, 1986 set forth new provisions, generallyeffective for cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985,for Medicare payment of direct GME costs. One of these provisions, addeda new section 1861(v)(1)(Q) of the Act which, in effect, nullified theJuly 1985 final rule. Section 9202 of Public Law 99-272 also added a newsection 1886(h) of the Act, which is effective for cost reporting periodsbeginning on or after July 1, 1985. Consequently, the provisions of thisfinal rule will be applied retroactively to cost reporting periods beginningon or after July 1, 1985. It applies to all hospitals, whether or not theyare subject to the prospective payment system. As an interim step, pendingissuance of this final rule, we informed the public in the <T4>Federal Register </T4> of May 6, 1986 (51 FR 16776) that the July 1985final rule had been rescinded. Section 9202 of Public Law 99-272 and its accompanying conference reportestablished two distinct components of the direct medical education pass-throughthat are used in determining Medicare payment for the costs of approvededucational activities_andbullet; Nursing and paramedical health professional (allied health) programs;and andbullet; Graduate medical, osteopathic, dental, and podiatric residencyprograms.The statutory language of section 1886(h) of the Act, as enacted by PublicLaw 99-272, does not specifically address Medicare payment for the costsof approved nursing and paramedical health professional programs. However,the conference report accompanying Public Law 99-272, (H.R. Rep. No. 453,99th Cong , 1st Sess. 484 (1985)) indicates that the Medicare program willcontinue to pay hospitals for the direct medical education costs associatedwith nursing and allied health training activities. In addition, section1861(v)(1)(Q) of the Act, as added by section 9202(i) of PubLic Law 99-272,prohibits the Secretary from limiting the rate of increase on allowablecosts of approved medical education activities other than as explicitlyauthorized by statute. Thus, section 9202 of Public Law 99-272 does notestablish a new payment methodology regarding Medicare's payment for approvednursing and paramedical health professional programs. The effect of section1861(v)(1)(Q) of the Act and the conference report, as cited above, isto restore the Medicare payment policy for these costs to the policy thatexisted prior to the publication of the July 1985 rule. Medicare will continueto pay a share of the allowable costs of approved nursing and paramedicalhealth professional programs using Medicare's principles of reasonablecost reimbursement. In this final rule, we have removed the provisions of current paragraph(a)(2) from andSection; 413.85 since section 9202(i) of Public Law 99-272has overturned the limitation set forth in this paragraph. We are alsorevising andSection; 413.85(e) to make changes to the list of the approvingbodies for certain nursing and paramedical programs. These changes willconform the regulations to existing policy, as described in chapter 4 ofthe Provider Reimbursement Manual (HCFA Pub. 15-1). Section 1886(h) of the Act revises the method for calculating Medicarepayment for the direct costs of approved GME activities effective for costreporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985. Section 1886(h) ofthe Act requires the calculation of hospital-specific approved per residentamounts for each hospital, which are to be determined based on the hospital'sallowable costs for its cost reporting period beginning during Federalfiscal year (FY) 1984 (that is, cost reporting periods beginning on orafter October 1, 1983 and before October 1, 1984). For most hospitals,that cost reporting period was their first period under the prospectivepayment system. For cost reporting periods beginning on or after October1, 1983 but before July 1, 1984, the average per resident amounts willbe updated by the Consumer Price Index in order to reflect inflation occurringin the intervening cost reporting period between the base period and thefirst cost reporting period to which the new methodology would apply. Therewould be no update factor applied to cost reporting periods beginning fromJuly 1, 1984 through September 30, 1984, since there is no interveningperiod between the base period and the first period to which the new methodologyapplies. For cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985 (that is,the first cost reporting period to which section 1886(h) of the Act applies),the per resident amount determined for the base period (that is, cost reportingperiods beginning on or after October 1, 1983 but before October 1, 1984)is to be updated by one percent. For subsequent periods, the per residentamounts are to be updated annually based on changes in the Consumer PriceIndex. The updated per resident amount is to be multiplied by the weighted averagenumber of full-time equivalent (FTE) residents in an approved program workingin the hospital during the cost reporting period to obtain an aggregateapproved amount. (As explained below, effective July 1, 1987, the timeresidents spend in patient care activities outside the hospital settingwill also be counted for purposes of determining FTEs if the hospital incursall or substantially all of the training costs in the outside setting.)Two weighting factors are involved. The first weighting factor to be usedis to apply an overall limitation on the number of years that a residentmay be counted as an FTE in calculating aggregate approved amounts. Thislimitation is to be based on an initial residency period (that is, theminimum number of years necessary to achieve board eligibility in a specialtyplus 1-year) not to exceed 5 years. Participation for up to 2 years incertain programs in geriatrics will not be counted in determining thislimitation. Residents who are no longer in initial residency periods areto be counted as 1.00 FTE prior to July 1, 1986, .75 FTE beginning July1, 1986, and .50 FTE beginning July 1, 1987. A second weighting factor to be applied is one regarding residents whoare graduates of foreign medical schools. Prior to July 1, 1986, theseresidents are counted as 1.00 FTE. Effective July 1, 1986, residents whoare graduates of foreign medical schools will not be counted at all unlessthey have passed the Foreign Medical Graduate Examination in Medical Science(FMGEMS) or have received certification from or have previously passedthe examination of the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates.However, section 1886(h)(4) of the Act provides a 1-year transition period(July 1, 1986 through June 30, 1987) for residents who do not meet oneof the above qualifying criteria but were in an approved program priorto July 1, 1986. During this 1-year period, these residents will be countedat a rate equal to one-half of the rate at which they would otherwise becounted. Section 1886(h) of the Act provides that the aggregate approved amountis to be multiplied by the proportion of Medicare hospital inpatient daysto total hospital inpatient days in order to determine Medicare's shareof direct GME costs. Medicare's share of the costs is then to be apportionedbetween Medicare's Part A (Hospital Insurance) and Part B (SupplementaryMedical Insurance) in such a manner as reasonably reflects the GME costsassociated with the provision of services under each part. Section 1886(h)(2)(E) of the Act provides that if a hospital did not havean approved GME program or did not participate in Medicare for its costreporting period beginning in FY 1984, then the Secretary is to determinean appropriate per resident amount. C. Public Law 99-509 Section 9314 of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1986 (Pub. L.99-509), enacted on October 21, 1986, added section 1886(h)(4)(E) to theAct to allow a hospital, for purposes of determining FTEs, to count thetime residents spend in patient care activities outside the hospital settingif the hospital incurs all or substantially all of the training costs inthe outside setting. This change is effective as of July 1, 1987. To implement both this legislative change and the changes made by PublicLaw 99-272, on September 21, 1988, we published a proposed rule in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 36589). In that document, we proposedto add a new andSection; 413.86 that would deal with payment for GME costsand to revise andSection; 413.85 for the purpose of making conforming changes.Our specific proposals are discussed in detail below. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Provisions of the Proposed Rule </ITAG>A. Removal of Limit on Costs As discussed above, section 1861(v)(1)(Q) of the Act prohibits the Secretaryfrom imposing limits on the rate of increase on allowable costs of medicaleducation other than as explicitly prescribed by law. Currently, andSection;413.85(a)(2) of the regulations imposes a limit on providers' net costsof approved educational activities for cost reporting periods beginningon or after July 1, 1985 and before July 1, 1986. In order to comply withthis statutory prohibition on limits, we proposed to remove the currentparagraph (a)(2) from andSection; 413.85. B. Medicare Payment for Approved GME Programs Section 1886(h) of the Act establishes a new methodology that is to beused for the purpose of determining Medicare's payment for the part ofthe direct medical education pass-through attributable to approved GMEprograms (that is, programs for training interns and residents, hereinafterreferred to as residency programs) in medicine, osteopathy, dentistry,or podiatry. Section 9202(b) of Public Law 99-272 specifies that this newmethodology is to apply to cost reporting periods beginning on or afterJuly 1, 1985. The new methodology provides for the determination of a hospital-specificbase-period per resident amount to be calculated by dividing a hospital'sallowable costs of graduate medical education for a base period by itsnumber of interns and residents in the base period. The base period isthe cost reporting period beginning in FY 1984 (that is, the period Octoberl, 1983 through September 30, 1984). We proposed to update the hospital-specificbase-period amount yearly as described below. The updated base-period per resident amount would be multiplied by thehospital's weighted number of FTE residents during each cost reportingperiod beginning on or after July 1, 1985 to determine an aggregate approvedamount for the period. The aggregate approved amount would represent thebasis for Medicare's support of approved residency programs for the period,with no consideration given to actual costs incurred for these programsduring a cost reporting period. Medicare's share of the aggregate approvedamount would be determined by the Medicare patient load as measured bythe ratio of Medicare hospital inpatient days to total hospital inpatientdays, and would be apportioned between Part A and Part B based on the ratioof Medicare's share of reasonable costs, excluding GME costs, attributableto each part. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Determining Base-Period per Resident Amounts </ITAG>a. <T3>Methodology. </T3>We proposed to determine an average FTE per residentamount for each hospital during its base cost reporting period. This hospital-specificaverage FTE per resident amount would be determined based on data reportedon the cost reports for that base period with respect to direct GME costsand the number of residents. Thus, we would determine the base-period perresident amount for each hospital by dividing the allowable GME costs forthe hospital's cost reporting period beginning in FY 1984 by the numberof FTE residents (exclusive of those employed to replace nonphysician anesthetists)reported by the hospital on its cost report for that cost reporting period.(Under the provisions of andSection; 413.85(d)(7), the cost of interns andresidents in anesthesiology who are employed to replace nonphysician anesthetistsare excluded as approved educational costs since they are not costs forthe actual operation of an approved education program.) In establishing the base-period per resident amount for a specific hospitalbased on FY 1984 GME costs, it is important that the amount determinedbe an accurate reflection of legitimate GME costs incurred during the FY1984 base period. Because the payment methodology required by section 1886(h)of the Act sets future payments using the FY 1984 base-period amounts asthe initial starting point, we believe that it is very important that inappropriatecosts not be included in the base-period amount. Therefore, we proposedto instruct Medicare contractors to reexamine FY 1984 GME costs and torequest appropriate supporting documentation in those cases in which reportedcosts seem questionable. Generally, we believe that this review activity would be limited to hospitalsand health care complexes that claimed either direct GME costs or indirectmedical education payments for cost reporting periods beginning in FY 1984.Cost reports should be amended to remove nonallowable and misclassifiedcosts from the GME base-period costs used to establish per resident amounts.We proposed to initiate this review and reaudit activity prior to the publicationof the final rule, so that as soon as possible after the publication offinal rule, intermediaries would be able to notify hospitals of their base-periodper resident amounts. We did not propose any specific time schedules forthis activity, however, in view of the significant other tasks that havebeen placed on Medicare contractors. Hospitals whose base-period GME costs appear to be in order would be notifiedof their base-period per resident amounts. We proposed that hospitals couldappeal this determination within 180 days of the later of their receiptof this notice concerning their per resident amounts or of receipt of anoriginal or revised Notice of Program Reimbursement for the GME base period.All appeals of per resident amounts must be appeals of the FY 1984 GMEcosts or resident counts used in the per resident amount determination.Section 1886(h) of the Act specifies that period as the base-period fordetermination of such amounts. In other words, a hospital could not appealits base-period per resident amount in connection with an appeal for thecost reporting period beginning July 1, 1985 or later. For teaching hospitals whose base-period GME costs appear to include misclassifiedor nonallowable costs or whose per resident amounts appear to be unreasonablyhigh or low, we proposed that intermediaries will notify these hospitalsthat their base-period costs will be reaudited. During the reaudits, hospitalswould have an opportunity to present documentation of any factors thatshould be taken into account in the final determination of their base-periodper resident amounts. If the basis for the disallowance of costs from thebase-period GME costs is nonallowability, rather than the misclassificationof costs, we proposed that recoupment of overpayments should be made forcost reporting periods beginning in FY 1984 and any prior or subsequentcost reporting period in which similar circumstances exist and which maystill be reopened under the limitations of andSection; 405.1885. A hospital whose base-period GME costs are reduced because of a misclassificationof operating costs as GME costs may want to reexamine the classificationof the affected costs in its prospective payment system base year and requestrevisions to the prospective payment base-year cost report. If the costsin question were similarly treated in the prospective payment base year,the hospital may want to receive the benefit of consistent treatment ofthe costs in question as operating costs for the purpose of adjusting itshospital-specific rate (HSR) due to the treatment of GME costs. We proposedthat a hospital's cost report for the prospective payment system base yearthat may no longer be reopened under andSection; 405.1885 may, nevertheless,be reopened but only for the sole purpose of adjusting its HSR for themisclassified GME costs. This adjustment would be based on a recalculationof the hospital's prospective payment system base-year costs. However,no overpayment would be recovered or underpayment paid for the prospectivepayment system base-year costs if the hospital's cost report for its prospectivepayment system base year is no longer subject to reopening under andSection;405.1885. The modification of the prospective payment system base-yearcosts would be used solely to adjust the hospital's HSR for cost reportingperiods under the prospective payment system. Under andSection; 405.1885, there is a 3-year restriction on reopenings ofsettled cost reports. We proposed to create a special exception to thistime limit so that a hospital could request an adjustment to its HSR. Thehospital must request this special reopening within 180 days of the noticeto the hospital by the intermediary of the hospital's GME base-period perresident amount. The hospital would bear the burden of proof to documentthe appropriate treatment of the costs in the prospective payment baseyear. If the hospital can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the intermediarythat this change should be made, the intermediary would appropriately modifyretroactively the hospital's base-year cost report used to determine theHSR with respect to operating costs misclassified as GME. As proposed,this modification would be a special exception to our policy concerningretroactive modification of the prospective payment system base-year costs,as specified in andSection;andSection; 412.71 and 412.72. (That policy is thatan intermediary's original estimate of the HSR for purposes of the prospectivepayment system may not be revised unless the estimate was erroneous basedon information available to the intermediary at the time of the estimate.)In the proposed rule, we emphasized that this policy change is a one-timemodification, solely for purposes of calculating GME costs. This changeis necessary to properly implement section 1886(h) of the Act, which prescribesthe new GME payment methodology. In addition, andSection; 412.113(b) requiresthat the allowable costs involved in setting the HSR should be recognizedconsistently as either GME costs or operating costs through the prospectivepayment system transition period. This proposed policy change relating to the prospective payment systembase-year costs that are used to establish the HSR would be limited toinpatient operating costs that were misclassified as GME costs. Any adjustmentsto the HSR that are made as a result of this proposed policy change couldnot include other elements of costs that may have been omitted from theoriginal determination of a provider's HSR. If a hospital similarly misclassified any of its GME costs as operatingcosts in the GME base period, the methodology prescribed in section 1886(h)of the Act would preclude this hospital from receiving Medicare paymentfor the misclassified GME costs. Therefore, in these situations, we againproposed that, if a hospital wants the benefit of the appropriate classificationof these legitimate GME costs for the purpose of determining its per residentamount, and if the hospital's cost report for the prospective payment systembase year is no longer subject to reopening under andSection; 405.1885, thecost report may nevertheless be reopened. The hospital would need to presentits intermediary with sufficient evidence in order to satisfy the intermediarythat a change in classification of costs is necessary. If the intermediaryis satisfied that such a change is appropriate, the intermediary wouldadjust the hospital's HSR and recompute the per resident amount in orderto reflect the change. We further proposed that any hospital requesting such a change would haveto accept the consequences of a reduced HSR retroactive to the first costreporting period subject to the prospective payment system. A hospitalthat believes its FY 1984 GME costs were inappropriately low based on misclassificationof GME costs as operating costs would have up to 180 days after notificationby its intermediary of its base-period per resident amount to present thisadditional information. This special reopening provision would be availableto hospitals for the sole purpose of correcting a misclassification ofGME costs as operating costs. In both of the above situations involving the adjustment of HSRs, the actionis taking place at the request of the hospital or health care complex tomitigate certain negative, though unintended, results of the enactmentof section 1886(h) of the Act. Therefore, we proposed that, notwithstandingthe provisions of andSection; 405.1885 (a) and (c), all cost reporting periodsbeginning with the period that served as the prospective payment base yearthat are no longer subject to reopening may nevertheless be subject tothis special reopening. The practical implication of this proposal is topermit reopening in some cases and for a limited purpose after the usual3-year limitation on reopening of settled cost reports. We emphasized thatthis special reopening procedure would apply only at the request of thehospital and only to operating costs misclassified as GME costs or GMEcosts misclassified as operating costs. All other elements of the Medicarecost reports for the years in question would remain settled. We proposed to use the number of residents reported on the FY 1984 costreport under indirect medical education payment rules as the denominatorin calculating base-period per resident amounts. Because of the enactmentof section 1886(h) of the Act, we also proposed to modify the criteriagoverning the counting of interns and residents in approved programs forthose hospitals that first entered the prospective payment system duringthe period October 1, 1983 through December 31, 1983. For these hospitals,we proposed to use the counting criteria adopted in the January 3, 1984prospective payment rule (49 FR 234) for the purpose of calculating thebase-period per resident amount. The September 1, 1983 interim final rule that implemented the prospectivepayment system provided that, in calculating the ratio of interns and residentsto inpatient hospital beds, a prospective payment system hospital couldcount only those interns and residents in approved programs that were employedby the hospital and who furnished services at that hospital (48 FR 39829).However, in the final rule published January 3, 1984, we modified thispolicy as a result of the comments received on the interim final rule.As discussed in the preamble of that final rule (49 FR 268), we changedour counting policy to allow hospitals to include in their indirect GMEintern and resident count, those residents employed by an organizationwith a long-standing historical medical relationship with the hospital.The organization had to be the sole employer of substantially all of theinterns and residents furnishing services at the hospital. This changewas effective for cost reporting periods beginning on or after January1, 1984. This prospective application of the revised policy was determinedto be appropriate at that time because of the prospective nature of theprospective payment system.Because we believe that there is a genuine program interest in using auniform counting method for purposes of determining per resident amounts,we proposed to adopt the policy of counting interns and residents thatwas described in the January 3, 1984 prospective payment final rule retroactivelyto the onset of the prospective payment system. We would include in a hospital'sindirect GME count those interns and residents employed by an organizationthat has a longstanding relationship with a hospital to furnish substantiallyall of the hospital's residents. This proposed policy would apply to allhospitals that entered the prospective payment system in FY 1984. If a hospital's base period reflects GME costs for a period other thana full year, we proposed that the intermediary would convert the allowablecosts for the base period to a monthly figure and multiply this figureby 12 in order to derive the approved per resident amount for a 12-monthcost reporting period. This adjustment to costs would be permissible onlyif either_andbullet; The length of the base period cost reporting period is shorterthan 50 weeks or longer than 54 weeks; or andbullet; The hospital's GME program began after the first month of thehospital's base period.If a hospital has more than one cost reporting period beginning duringFY 1984 (because of a short cost reporting period), we proposed that thelatest period would serve as the base period since it is likely that itis more representative of future GME costs. If the latest period is alsoa short period, allowable GME costs would also be converted to a monthlyfigure and multiplied by 12 as discussed above. Section 1886(h)(2)(B) of the Act requires that, for hospitals whose costreporting periods began between October 1, 1983 and June 30, 1984, theamount derived for the base year be updated by the percentage increasein the Consumer Price Index (CPI) between the hospital's cost reportingperiod that began during FY 1984 (the GME base period) and the first costreporting period to which this provision applies. In making this adjustment,we proposed, as discussed in the conference agreement that accompaniedsection 9202 of Public Law 99-272, (H. R. Rep. No. 453, 99th Cong., 1stSess. 484 (1985)), to use the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers(CPI-U), a generally accepted measure of inflation. However, if the hospital'sbase-period cost reporting period began on or after July 1, 1984 and beforeOctober 1, 1984, updating is not necessary since the base period occurredimmediately prior to the first cost reporting period to which this provisionwould apply. The base-period costs would be updated using an inflation factor tied tothe month that the cost reporting period began. Included below are theupdating factors that we proposed to use. The CPI-U factors shown belowapply only to 12-month periods that begin and end in the same month forboth years. If this is not the case, we proposed that intermediaries contactHCFA Central Office as to the appropriate factor to use. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/>  <H1>Cost reporting period </H1><H1>Update factor*_percent</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">10/1/83 to 9/30/84 <D>4.20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">11/1/83 to 10/31/84 <D>4.03 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">12/1/83 to 11/30/84 <D>3.95 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 1/1/84 to 12/31/84 <D>3.57 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 2/1/84 to 1/31/85 <D>3.52 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 3/1/84 to 2/28/85 <D>3.74 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 4/1/84 to 3/31/85 <D>3.66 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 5/1/84 to 4/30/85 <D>3.75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 6/1/84 to 5/31/85 <D>3.73 </D><F>* The inflation factor represents the 12-month average change in theCPI-U during the intervening period between the provider's base periodand the first cost reporting period beginning on or after July 1, 1985.</F></ITAG></ITAG> b. <T3>Updating for cost reporting periods that begin from July 1, 1985 throughJune 30, 1986. </T3>As required by section 1886(h)(2)(C) of the Act, weproposed to increase the base-period FTE amount, discussed above, by onepercent (that is, multiplied by 1.01) for purposes of determining the approvedper resident amount applicable to the hospital's cost reporting periodthat began on or after July 1, 1985 but before July 1, 1986. c. <T3>Updating for cost reporting periods that begin on or after July 1,1986. </T3>Section 1886(h)(2)(D) of the Act states that, for subsequentcost reporting periods (that is, those beginning on or after July 1, 1986)``* * * the approved FTE resident amount for the hospital is equal to theamount determined under this paragraph for the previous cost reportingperiod updated, through the midpoint of the period, by projecting the estimatedpercentage change in the consumer price index during the 12-month periodending at that midpoint, with appropriate adjustments to reflect previousunder- or over-estimations under this subparagraph in the projected percentagechange in the consumer price index.'' We proposed to use the CPI-U to implementthis provision. Thus, for cost reporting periods beginning on or afterJuly 1, 1986, the FTE resident amount would be determined by applying the12-month average change in the CPI-U to the per resident amount applicablein the previous cost reporting period. The 12-month average change in theCPI-U represents inflation through the midpoint relative to 12 months earlier.We proposed that the intermediary use the projected percentage change forinterim payment purposes only and adjust the final settlement amount basedon the actual average CPI-U percentage change for the months comprisingthe cost reporting period. The reference to overestimations and underestimationsis necessary for purposes of interim payments since the actual inflationrate is not known in advance. However, the actual inflation rate generallybecomes available shortly after the end of the cost reporting period andthus the actual rate would be used for settlement purposes. Also, it willbe necessary for providers to notify intermediaries of their best estimatesof the average number of resident FTEs that should be counted for the costreporting period for purposes of interim payments. d. <T3>Per resident amounts for certain Hospitals. </T3>Section 1886(h)(2)(E)of the Act requires us to provide a method for determining an appropriateper resident amount for ``* * * a hospital that did not have an approvedmedical residency training program or was not participating in * * *.''Medicare during a cost reporting period that began on or after October1, 1983 and before October 1, 1984. In order to implement this provision, we proposed that a hospital's intermediarywould establish an average per resident amount for the hospital based onthe lower of_andbullet; The actual direct graduate medical education costs of the hospitalduring its first year of operation of a GME program; or andbullet; The mean value of per resident amounts of hospitals located inthe same wage area, as that term is used for purposes of the prospectivepayment system in andSection;andSection; 412.62 and 412.63, for cost reportingperiods beginning in the same fiscal year. The intermediaries would determine an average per resident amount for thesehospitals based on the hospital's actual cost for the first cost reportingperiod during which residents were on duty in their GME program duringthe first month of the cost reporting period. For the purpose of this calculation,we proposed that residents would be counted in the same way as they wouldfor all other hospitals (see description of counting methodology in sectionII.B.4 of this final rule) except that the weighting factors would notbe applied. The intermediary would compare this amount with the mean valueof per resident amounts of other teaching hospitals located in the samewage area (as that term is used in the prospective payment system) forcost reporting periods beginning in the same fiscal year. The intermediarywould then base its payment on the lower of these amounts (that is, actualper resident amount based on actual allowable costs for the first year,or per resident amounts of other teaching hospitals in the same wage area).If there are fewer than three amounts in the wage area, we proposed thatthe intermediary write HCFA Central Office for a determination of the perresident amount to use. The per resident amount used for the first yearwould be updated in future years without regard to actual costs. The proposed rule further specified that this provision would not be appliedto hospitals that expand existing programs or that establish residencyprograms in additional specialties during the base period. It also wouldnot apply to certain hospitals in States that were formerly paid undera waiver from the Medicare inpatient hospital prospective payment systemthat incurred GME costs but did not allocate these costs to the internand resident cost center. (See the discussion in section II.B.10. of thisfinal rule, below). <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Determining Full-Time Equivalency (FTE)</ITAG>Section 1886(h)(4) of the Act bases payment for direct GME costs on a hospital'snumber of full-time equivalent (FTE) residents multiplied by a hospital-specificper resident amount. Since our main concern in the counting of residentsis that no individual be counted as more than one FTE, we did not proposeto define a FTE based on a specific number of hours worked per week orper year. Rather, we proposed that FTE status would be based on the totaltime necessary to fill a residency slot. As proposed, the number of hours involved would vary from specialty programto specialty program within a hospital and could vary from hospital tohospital for the same type of program. For example, if a resident spendsall of his or her time in one hospital and is considered by the approvedresidency program to meet all the requirements of a full-time resident,the resident would always be counted as one FTE (before application ofany applicable weighting factors). However, if a resident spends time inmore than one hospital, that resident would not be counted as one FTE foreither hospital regardless of the actual hours worked. Rather, we proposedthat resident's time should be prorated between or among the hospitalsto total no more than one FTE. Section 1886(h)(4)(B) of the Act requires us to take into account, in determiningFTEs, individuals who serve as part-time residents. We proposed to countthese part-time residents based on the proportion of time worked as comparedto the average time spent by others in the same year working in the samespecialty program. For example, if a part-time resident spends only sixtypercent of the time spent by others in the same program, the part-timeresident would be counted as .6 FTE. Similarly, in situations in whichtwo residents ``share'' one residency slot, no more than one FTE wouldbe counted for the two individuals for the duration of the shared residency.As discussed in the proposed rule, neither of the above policies wouldapply to full-time residents who spend time sequentially, in more thanone hospital. They also would not apply to a full-time resident who dropsout of a program. In both of these cases, the individuals are consideredfull-time residents whose assignments to hospitals would be prorated ona monthly basis. In determining resident FTEs, we proposed that we would first determinewhether the resident is to be counted by the hospital at all. Accordingly,we argued that it was appropriate not to include in a hospital's residentFTE count those residents for whom no hospital participating in Medicareincurs salary/stipend and fringe benefit costs, such as residents in VeteransAdministration or Department of Defense programs who are on rotation atcivilian hospitals and whose salaries or stipends are fully paid by thoserespective Federal entities. We also proposed to prorate FTEs based on the time spent among hospitalsby individual residents on a monthly basis. When resident rotations tohospitals are for periods of time other than monthly segments, we proposedthat the hospital in which the resident spent the majority of the monthwill receive full credit for the month and the other hospitals will receiveno credit for that month. Residency programs are based in hospitals in some cases and in medicalschools with affiliated hospitals in others. Although the information onthe counting of residents must come from the teaching hospitals claimingpayment, we argued that it would be helpful, and facilitate payment, ifprogram officials would voluntarily furnish the requisite data on residentassignments to all hospitals involved. The hospitals could then verifythe accuracy of their respective FTE count and retain the information forreview by the intermediary as needed. In order to ensure that all residents are properly counted and that noresident is counted as more than one FTE, we proposed to require that eachhospital maintain and have available the following information for eachresident whom it counts toward its number of FTEs:andbullet; The name and social security number of the resident. andbullet; The type of residency program in which the resident participatesand the number of years the resident has completed in all types of residencyprograms. andbullet; The dates the resident was assigned to the hospital during thecost reporting period. andbullet; The dates, if any, the resident was assigned to other hospitals.andbullet; The name of the medical, osteopathic, dental, or podiatric schoolfrom which the resident graduated and date of graduation. andbullet; In the case of graduates of foreign medical schools, the resident'sstatus concerning the Foreign Medical Graduate Examination in the MedicalSciences, or certification by the Education Commission for Foreign MedicalGraduates, and the appropriate date.We proposed that this information be certified by an official of the hospitaland, if different, an official responsible for administering the residencyprogram. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Counting Residents in Nonprovider Settings </ITAG>Prior to July l, 1987, the time a resident spends in nonprovider settings(that is, settings that are not considered part of a provider for Medicarepurposes) is not counted toward a hospital's FTE count. For example, ifthe normal GME program commitment for a third-year resident in Family Practiceat Hospital A is 80 hours per week and a resident spends 20 of those hoursper week in a freestanding family practice clinic, that resident is countedas .75 FTE in Hospital A's count. Effective July l, 1987, in accordance with section 1886(h)(4)(E) of theAct, we proposed to count the time a resident spends in nonprovider settingsif there is a written agreement between the hospital and the nonproviderentity to the effect that the hospital bears substantially all the trainingcosts in the outside setting. However, section 1886(h)(4)(E) of the Actspecifies that only time spent in activities relating to patient care maybe counted toward the hospital's FTE count. In the proposed rule, we solicitedcomments on methods under which intermediaries can ensure that the portionsof residency training programs that are spent in settings that are nota part of a hospital are spent in activities related to patient care. Wespecifically asked that suggestions address the data that hospitals wouldneed to maintain to substantiate the nature of assignments to settingsthat are not a part of a hospital. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Determining the Number of FTE Residents </ITAG>We proposed that the number of FTE residents for direct graduate medicaleducation payment purposes would be determined by applying a weightingfactor to each FTE resident, as explained below. a. <T3>Initial residency period and weighting factor.  </T3>Subject to specialrules concerning certain foreign medical graduates, in general, the weightingfactor that would apply to each resident in an initial residency periodwould be 1.0. Under section 1886(h)(5)(F) of the Act, an initial residencyperiod means the period of board eligibility plus one year, not to exceeda total of five years. Section 1886(h)(5)(G) of the Act defines the term ``period of board eligibility''as it applies to a resident to mean the minimum number of years of formaltraining necessary to satisfy the requirements for initial board eligibilityin the particular specialty for which the resident is training. The statutespecifically requires that the 1985-1986 Directory of Residency TrainingPrograms published by the American Medical Association (AMA) be used indetermining the period of board eligibility. This directory indicates thatmost specialty boards no longer use the term ``board eligible.'' However,as discussed in the proposed rule we believe that it is clear from thelanguage of the statute that, for the purpose of determining initial residencyperiods, it is the intent of Congress that we use the minimum number ofyears of training required to qualify for a specialty board's certifyingexamination plus l year.We also stated in the proposed rule that we believe that the definitionof resident in section 1886(h)(5)(H) of the Act is intended to includeresidents in approved programs in osteopathy, dentistry, and podiatry aswell as to residents who have a doctor of medicine (MD) degree. This intentis demonstrated by section 1886(h)(5)(D) of the Act which defines foreignmedical graduates as those who have not graduated from a school of medicine,osteopathy, dentistry, or podiatry that is recognized by Medicare. Therewould be no need for such a definition unless residents in those disciplineswere included in the definition of a resident. The Directory of ResidencyTraining Programs (the Directory) can be used as a source document onlyfor determining the lengths of initial residency periods for the typesof medical programs accredited by the Accreditation Council for GraduateMedical Education (ACGME). Therefore, for approved programs in osteopathy,dentistry, and podiatry, we contacted the appropriate accrediting organizationsfor these specialties and based our determinations of initial residencyperiods on the information they furnished to us. Whenever these accreditingbodies establish standards for new types of specialty programs, we haveencouraged them to notify HCFA so that this information can be disseminatedto our fiscal intermediaries. Our proposed determination of initial residency periods for medical residencyprograms was based on the sections of the Directory entitled, ``Essentialsof Accredited Residencies'' and ``Requirements for Certification.'' Theinitial residency period includes years in a qualifying prior program.The 4 years of full funding for the internal medicine subspecialties includesthe 3 years of a prerequisite general internal medicine program plus 1additional year. The second year of a subspecialty training program receivesa reduced weighting factor since it is in excess of the initial board eligibilityplus 1 year criterion. Although the Directory lists the minimum number of years for surgical residenciesas 5 or more, we proposed to attach a weight of 1.0 to a surgical residentfor 5 years, but not for an additional year, because section 1886(h)(5)(F)of the Act specifies 5 years as the maximum period we can count a residentas 1.0 FTE. Similarly, the Directory lists the minimum number of yearsfor a residency in family practice as 3. Thus, we proposed that a familypractice resident who specializes further in an approved program wouldbe counted fully for the fourth year of GME training and partially fora fifth or subsequent year. In both situations residents would be countedpartially after their initial residency periods (that is, .75 from July1, 1986 through June 30, 1987 and .5 thereafter). In addition, we proposed that a resident who has used up the time allottedto an initial residency period before July 1, 1986 and then participatesin either the same or a different program would be counted only partiallythereafter. As proposed, this would also apply to the situation in whicha resident spends some time in one residency program and decides to changespecialties before completing that program. As was discussed in the proposed rule, some of the programs are subspecialtyprograms of other programs. For example, cardiology is a subspecialty ofinternal medicine. Section 1886(h)(5)(F) of the Act states that the initialresidency period must be determined at the time the resident enters theresidency training program. All of the subspecialties of internal medicinerequire that the subspecialty training be preceded by completion of anaccredited program in internal medicine. Thus, the internal medicine residencyprogram controls the length of the initial residency period. That is, theinitial residency period would consist of a 3-year program in internalmedicine plus 1 additional year of an appropriate subspecialty program.Similarly, only one year of an accredited allergy and immunology residencywould be included in an initial residency period since this program requiresa 3-year residency in internal medicine as a prerequisite. As soon as aphysician enters a basic internal medicine program, whether immediatelyafter medical school or after a transitional year (see discussion below),the 3-year duration of the internal medicine program governs the lengthof time the resident is counted as 1.0 FTE. In this case, the initial residencyperiod would be 3 years for the internal medicine program plus 1 year (eithera transitional year or a year of a subspecialty program, but not both).Section 1886(h)(5)(F)(ii) of the Act provides for an exemption (up to 2years) from the initial residency period limitation for individuals enrolledin a ``* * * geriatric residency or fellowship program which meets thecriteria as the Secretary may establish * * *.'' Currently, there is noprivate sector program of accreditation or approval for graduate programsof physician training in geriatric medicine. Accordingly, we were unableto obtain extensive information on geriatric programs prior to publishingthe proposed rule. Therefore, we solicited comments on our proposed approachto implementing this provision of the law. We proposed that geriatric fellowship programs, which an individual entersupon completion of a basic specialty program, should be the focus of thegeriatric exception to initial residency periods established by section1886(h)(5)(F) of the Act. It is our understanding that these fellowshipprograms are normally of 1 to 2 years' duration, and they are undertakenby residents upon completion of approved programs in internal medicine,family practice, or other basic specialty programs. Thus, if a residentcompletes a 3-year family practice program and enters a 2-year geriatricfellowship program, the latter would not be counted against the individual'sinitial residency period of 4 years. In fact, that individual could stillhave 1 additional year in another type of approved program upon completionof the geriatric fellowship program in which to be fully counted. Thus,that individual's initial residency period would be computed as follows:3 years in a family practice residency program plus 2 years in a geriatricfellowship (not counted) plus 1 year in another unspecified approved program.In this way, the individual would be fully counted for 6 years of actualtraining even though his or her initial residency period consists of only4 years.It was our understanding that the ACGME will soon be establishing the criteriaunder which fellowships programs will be accredited as geriatric trainingprograms for residents who have completed specialty programs in internalmedicine or family practice. We proposed to use ACGME's criteria for purposesof determining what constitutes an approved geriatric fellowship programfor these specialties. We also proposed that once the ACGME accredits aprogram in one of these specialties, HCFA will treat that program as anapproved residency program for the purpose of including the participantsof the program in the direct graduate medical education FTE count. We wouldtreat the program as approved retroactively to the later of_ andbullet; The date the program was established; or andbullet; The cost reporting period beginning on or after July 1, 1985.We proposed to recognize these programs retroactively to the effectivedate of section 1886(h) of the Act (that is, cost reporting periods beginningon or after July 1, 1985) since Congress expressly provided for a geriatricexception in section 1886(h) of the Act. We also proposed to consider expandingthe exception to geriatric fellowship programs in other specialties whenthe appropriate national organization establishes criteria for approvingthese programs. In the last few years, ACGME has begun to accredit transitional year programs.The Directory indicates that these programs are provided for medical schoolgraduates who_ andbullet; Have chosen a career specialty that requires as a prerequisitean entry year of fundamental clinical education; andbullet; Desire a broader base of clinical experience than is initiallyprovided by their chosen specialty; or andbullet; Plan to enter active duty in the military. These programs are apparently different from other ACGME accredited programsin that there is no board certification and, for initial residency periodpurposes, they must be considered in conjunction with other types of programsas set forth below. For these programs, there is no transitional year initialresidency period limitation. Several types of specialties, for example, anesthesiology, require a ``clinicalbase year'' or other type of fundamental training as an integral part ofthe accredited training program. In these cases, the transitional yearprogram is counted as part of the medical specialty program for the purposeof determining the initial residency period and does not count as the additionalyear beyond initial board eligibility. For example, in anesthesiology,the one ``clinical base year'' is added to the 3 years of training in clinicalanesthesia to comprise a 4-year training program. The additional year allowedby section 1886(h)(5)(F) of the Act would then be added to total a 5-yearinitial residency period (1+3+1=5). In the case of a medical school graduate desiring a broader base of clinicalexperience, the transitional year is an additional year of training undertakenby a resident beyond the requirements for certification in a specialty.In these cases, we proposed that participation in the transitional yearprogram would count as the additional year beyond the minimum number ofyears of training that is required for board certification. (Transitionalyear+number of years of training required for board certification=initialresidency period, provided that the total does not exceed five years.)In the case of the medical graduate planning to enter active duty in themilitary, there is a single year of broad-based clinical training in anACGME accredited program before the resident enters active duty in themilitary. If the resident in this type of program is in his or her firstresidency program after graduation from medical school or has not exceededthe limits of an initial residency period in another specialty, we proposedthat the resident be counted as 1.0 FTE for that one year. If the residentsubsequently leaves the military and enters a residency program, the transitionalyear would be counted towards that resident's initial residency periodat that time. However, any training in a residency program operated bythe military that may be counted towards board certification would alsocount towards the initial residency period. As stated in the proposed rule, we are interpreting the statutory use ofthe term ``medical'' in section 9202 of Public Law 99-272 to include osteopathic,dental, and podiatric residents. Section 1886(h)(5)(A) of the Act definesapproved residency programs as those programs that count toward certificationin a specialty or subspecialty.It is our understanding that in most osteopathic graduate medical educationprograms, the first year of training is a rotating internship that is requiredprior to acceptance in a residency program. Specialized residency trainingdoes not begin until the second year of postgraduate training, which is counted as the first year of residency training in the osteopathic profession.Therefore, we proposed to treat the first year of osteopathic graduatemedical education in the same fashion as the transitional year programsin medical programs. That is, since the rotating internship is requiredfor further training in all programs, it counts as the first year of aninitial residency period. Thus, we proposed that the first year would notbe counted as the additional year beyond board eligibility as specifiedin the 1985-1986 Yearbook and Directory of Osteopathic Physicians. Forexample, the Directory of Osteopathic Physicians specifies a 3-year residencyfor osteopaths entering internal medicine. We proposed to count such aresident for 5 years, the 1 year rotating internship plus 3 years, plus1 additional year if that resident enters another year of approved training.In no case would any resident be counted as 1.0 FTE beyond 5 years. Approximately one-half of all dental residents are in 1-year or 2-yeargeneral practice residencies. The information we have received from theAmerican Dental Association indicates that general practice is neithera recognized dental specialty nor required or counted towards meeting theboard eligibility requirement for dental specialties. Therefore, a strictapplication of the definition of an ``approved medical residency trainingprogram'' as set forth in section 1886(h)(5)(A) of the Act would precludeour recognizing these programs as approved programs under section 1886(h)of the Act. However, since we could find no evidence in the conferencereport that accompanied section 9202 of Public Law 99-272 that Congressintended a reduction in the types of programs Medicare supports, we proposedto continue to recognize dental general practice programs as approved programsunder the authority of section 1861(b)(6) of the Act. However, the paymentmethodology to be used would be that proposed for implementation of section1886(h) of the Act. We proposed to treat dental general practice programs in the same way thatwe would treat transition year medical residency programs. A resident ina 1-year or 2-year general practice program would be counted as a residentin an approved program for the purpose of this section. However, if anindividual enters a specialty program at a later date, the year or yearsof general practice residency would be counted toward the initial residencyperiod for the specialty training. In the case of 2-year approved generalpractice residency programs, both years would count toward completion ofthe initial residency period for the specialty involved. b. <T3>Resident not in an initial residency period. </T3>As required by section1886(h)(4)(C)(iii) and (iv) of the Act, we proposed that the weightingfactor for residents who are not in a period of initial residency (limitedto 5 years) would be 1.00 prior to July 1, 1986, .75 during any portionof a hospital's cost reporting period occurring from July 1, 1986 throughJune 30, 1987, and thereafter would be .50. <ITAG tagnum="81">5. Special Rule for Foreign Medical Graduates </ITAG>a. <T3>Definition of a foreign medical graduate. </T3>We proposed that, asspecified in section 1886(h)(5)(D) of the Act, the term foreign medicalgraduate (FMG) means an individual who is not a graduate of one of thefollowing: andbullet; A medical school accredited by the Liaison Committee on MedicalEducation of the American Medical Association which accredits medical schoolsin the United States and Canada (or approved by the committee as meetingthe standards necessary for accreditation). andbullet; An osteopathy school accredited (or approved as meeting the standardsnecessary for such accreditation) by the American Osteopathic Association.andbullet; A dental or podiatry school that is accredited by an organization(or meets the standards for accreditation) recognized by the Secretary.b. <T3>Requirement for application of 1.0 weighting factor. </T3>We proposedthat, as specified in section 1886(h)(4)(D)(i) of the Act, effective July1, 1986, a resident who is an FMG and who otherwise qualifies by beingin an initial residency period would be considered to have a weightingfactor of 1.0 only if the individual_andbullet; Has passed Day 1 and Day 2 of the Foreign Medical Graduate Examinationin Medical Sciences (FMGEMS); or andbullet; Has received certification from, or has passed an examinationof, the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG) beforeJuly 1, 1986. c. <T3>Transition period rule. </T3>We proposed that during a transition periodfrom July 1, 1986 through June 30, 1987, the otherwise applicable weightfor an FMG, who was a resident before, on, and after July 1, 1986 but whohas not passed FMGEMS or met the ECFMG requirements would be multipliedby .5. Thus, any such resident who is no longer in an initial residencyperiod would be counted as .375 FTE (.5andmultiply;.75=.375). Any FMG whoseresidency begins on or after July 1, 1986, and who, by the date the residencybegins, has not passed FMGEMS or received certification from or passedan examination of ECFMG, would not be counted at all. d. <T3>Counting FMGs who pass FMGEMS. </T3>As was discussed in the proposedrule, once an FMG passes FMGEMS, the FMG is counted on the same basis asany other resident in an approved program. Thus, the FMG is counted as1.0 if the FMG is in an initial residency period. For the period July 1,1986 through June 30, 1987, an FMG who is not in an initial residency periodwould be counted as .75 and as .5 for the period beginning on July 1, 1987.The counting of FMGs is complicated by the fact that the time spent inan approved residency program counts toward the completion of an initialresidency period regardless of whether the FMG who has not passed FMGEMSis partially counted or not counted at all. The definition of an initialresidency period in section 1886(h)(5)(F) of the Act does not require thattraining be subsidized by Medicare in order for the training to be countedtowards the completion of an initial residency period. Thus, any trainingthat can be counted toward certification in a specialty, including anytraining outside the United States that has been deemed acceptable, iscounted in the determination of the initial residency period. <ITAG tagnum="81">6. Medicare Patient Load </ITAG>Section 1886(h)(3)(C) of the Act defines ``Medicare patient load'' duringa cost reporting period as ``* * * the fraction of the total number ofinpatient-bed-days (as established by the Secretary) during the periodwhich are attributable to patients with respect to whom payment may bemade under part A.'' This definition provides the basis for determiningMedicare's share of GME costs that would be paid to a hospital or healthcare complex using the proposed payment methodology. We proposed that thecalculation be made by dividing total part A inpatient days by total inpatientdays (that is, Medicare and non-Medicare inpatient days) to determine theMedicare patient load. In the case of a health care complex, we proposedthat the Medicare patient load for the hospital part of the complex beused as the Medicare payment share for the complex as a whole. As proposed, the inpatient days would include inpatient days of the hospitalthat are payable under part A, which include special care units of thehospital along with its subproviders, including distinct part psychiatric,rehabilitation, and alcohol/drug units that are excluded from the prospectivepayment system. (We noted that alcohol/drug units were excluded from theprospective payment system for cost reporting periods beginning beforeOctober 1, 1987.) As is the case with other apportionment issues, hospitalinpatient days of Medicare beneficiaries whose hospital stays are paidby risk-basis health maintenance organizations are recorded as non-Medicaredays. Inpatient days applicable to hospital-based skilled nursing facilitiesand intermediate care facilities would not be counted for the purpose ofdetermining the Medicare patient load.<ITAG tagnum="81">7. Apportionment Between Part A and Part B</ITAG>Although section 1886(h)(1) of the Act provides for the ``allocation''of Medicare payment between Part A and Part B, we interpreted this to meanthat Medicare's liability for direct GME payment must be apportioned betweenthe respective trust funds from which payments are made. We proposed thatpayment under Part A and payment under Part B be based on the ratio ofMedicare's share of reasonable costs excluding graduate medical educationcosts attributable to each part for the individual provider as determinedthrough normal Medicare cost finding rules. <ITAG tagnum="81">8. Identifying Approved Teaching Programs </ITAG>In addition to the changes required by section 1886(h) of the Act, we proposedto clarify what constitutes an approved program for the purpose of paymentfor direct GME costs. Program experience indicates that in the past therehas been a problem in identifying approved teaching programs for certainmedical subspecialties. These programs are sometimes called ``fellowship''programs. In some areas of medical specialty, subspecialty training programs havetraditionally been accredited independently of general programs in thespecialty. Examples of this are thoracic and neurological surgery programsthat are accredited independently of general surgery programs. In otherspecialties, however, individual subspecialty programs were not accreditedalthough they were given in conjunction with an accredited general specialtyprogram. The most notable example of this situation is in the specialtyof internal medicine. A resident completed a three-year program in generalinternal medicine and entered a fellowship program (for example, cardiology,nephrology, or oncology) for which the resident received a certificateof special competence by the appropriate board. Prior to 1986, these subspecialtyprograms were not individually accredited, and we have received severalinquiries as to whether these programs should be treated as approved programs.Historically, section 1861(b)(6) of the Act has provided the statutorybasis for determining approval of GME programs. It cites approving bodiesfor graduate programs in medicine, osteopathy, dentistry, and podiatryThe approving body for GME programs in medicine is currently the ACGME.(Section 1861(b)(6) of the Act cites the Council on Medical Education ofthe American Medical Association. This association has been replaced inthis function by the ACGME. Section 1873 of the Act permits the recognitionof successor organizations at the discretion of the Secretary.) The Medicare program has generally treated fellowship programs as if theywere accredited and paid for the services of residents in these programsas residents in approved programs. We argued in the proposed rule thatit was not the intent of Congress, in adding section 1886(h)(5)(A) to theAct, to change that practice. The law and conference report do not indicatethat section 1886(h)(5)(A) of the Act was intended to change the typesof residency programs that Medicare supports except to expand the coverageto programs in geriatric medicine. Section 1886(h)(5)(A) of the Act sets forth a new definition of an approvedmedical residency program that largely resolves any question about thestatus of these fellowship programs in past years. It defines an approvedmedical residency program as ``a residency or other postgraduate medicaltraining program participation in which may be counted toward certificationin a specialty or subspecialty * * *.'' Thus, for the purpose of determiningdirect GME costs, Congress has shifted the emphasis from the accreditationof the program to the acceptability of the training for the purpose ofattaining certification in a specialty or subspecialty. Further, the internalmedicine subspecialty programs are now individually accredited by the ACGME.However, section 1886(h)(5)(A) of the Act did not change the existing referencein section 1861(b)(6) of the Act with respect to approved programs. Therefore,we were faced with the rather complicated situation of having two statutorydefinitions of an approved residency program for cost reporting periodsbeginning on or after July 1, 1985. We proposed to resolve this matterby defining an approved program as a residency program in medicine, osteopathy,dentistry, or podiatry that is approved by one of the national accreditingbodies set forth in section 1861(b)(6) of the Act or that may be countedtoward certification in a medical specialty or subspecialty cited in the1985-1986 Directory of Residency Training Programs. Furthermore, any fellowshipprogram that meets the requirements of an approved program in geriatricmedicine as defined by the Secretary will also be included in this definition.In the case of residents or fellows in programs that meet none of thesecriteria, we proposed that Medicare would pay its share of the costs ofresidents not in approved programs as described in andSection; 405.523 ofour regulations regarding residents not in approved teaching programs.Under andSection; 405.523, hospitals are paid under Part B for up to 80 percentof the reasonable costs of services (that is, salaries and salary-relatedfringe benefits) of interns and residents who are not in approved programs,after payment of the Part B deductible by the Medicare beneficiary. Noother educational program costs (that is, faculty compensation costs andother direct and indirect program expenses) in connection with such residentsare payable. The Medicare beneficiary incurs the expense of deductibleand coinsurance amounts as determined on the basis of the hospital's chargesunder Part B of the Medicare program. The costs relating to patient care services of licensed physicians whoare classified as ``fellows'' but who are not in an identifiable formalprogram leading to certification as defined in section 1886(h)(5) of theAct but remain at a teaching hospital/medical school complex to enhancetheir expertise in a field of study are payable on a Part B reasonablecharge basis as physicians' services. <ITAG tagnum="81">9. Special Treatment for States Formerly Under a Waiver From Medicare'sHospital Reimbursement System</ITAG>Section 9202(j) of Public Law 99-272 provides that, effective with costreporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 1986, hospitals in aState whose waiver under section 1886(c) of the Act for the operation ofa State reimbursement control system has been terminated are permittedto change the order in which they allocate administrative and general coststo the order specified in the Medicare cost report. The only three Statesthat were reimbursed under a waiver that has been terminated are Massachusetts,New Jersey, and New York. Hospitals in Massachusetts and New York werepaid under a reimbursement system approved under section 402 of the SocialSecurity Amendments of 1967 (Pub. L. 90-248) or section 222(a) of the SocialSecurity Amendments of 1972 (Pub. L. 92-603). Of these States, New York is the only State affected by this provision.Most hospitals in New York, including hospitals with direct medical educationcost centers, allocate administrative and general costs in a manner thatdiffers from the recommended order prescribed in the Medicare cost report.Many of these hospitals use an order of allocation in which the administrativeand general cost center follows, rather than precedes, the direct medicaleducation cost centers. As a result of this methodology, none of the hospital'sadministrative and general costs were allocated to the direct medical educationcost centers. This has had the effect of increasing the Medicare inpatientoperating costs for teaching hospitals in New York and reducing the amountof medical education costs including the GME costs upon which the residentamounts are to be based. It was because of concerns about this matter thatCongress enacted section 9202(j) of Public Law 99-272. Because New Yorknever had a reimbursement control program approved under section 1886(c)of the Act, as specified in that section of Public Law 99-272, we providedfor the same adjustment to be made in the September 3, 1986 final rulegoverning changes to the hospital prospective payment system (51 FR 31522)under the general exception and adjustment authority of section 1886(d)(5)(C)(iii)of the Act. Under that authority, we provided for_ andbullet; An adjustment of Federal regional prospective payment system ratesfor the middle Atlantic census division (of which New York is a part) basedon the assumption that all teaching hospitals in New York use the allocationorder prescribed in the Medicare cost report; and andbullet; An adjustment of the hospital-specific rate for hospitals thatchoose to follow the order of allocation prescribed by the Medicare costreport. We proposed to use that same authority to provide an adjustment of directGME costs for the cost reporting period beginning in FY 1984 for the purposeof determining per resident amounts. In order to accommodate this adjustment, we proposed to allow hospitalsin New York that have GME costs in the cost reporting period beginningin FY 1984 to change the method by which they allocate administrative andgeneral costs to the method specified in the Medicare cost report for FY1984 for the purpose of establishing per resident amounts. The intermediarywould have to ensure that the shifted costs are properly allocated betweencost of residency programs and costs of other medical education programs,since only the former go into the base used to determine the per residentamounts. These amounts should be updated as indicated for the cost reportingperiods beginning on or after July 1, 1985, even though the per residentamounts will not serve as the bases of Medicare payment in these hospitalsuntil January 1, 1986. Since the New York waiver ended for all hospitalseffective December 31, 1985, the per resident amounts will be applied tocost reporting periods or portions of cost reporting periods effectiveJanuary 1, 1986. As of that date, we proposed that direct GME costs ofNew York hospitals would be payable on the same basis that applies to hospitalsin other States. This proposed provision would not affect payments forcost reporting periods or parts of cost reporting periods that fall beforeJanuary 1, 1986. The New York teaching hospitals will have to continueto follow the specified allocation order to apportion costs between partA and part B thereafter.<ITAG tagnum="81">10. Teaching Hospitals That Elect Cost Payments for Physicians' DirectMedical and Surgical Services Furnished to Medicare Beneficiaries </ITAG>Section 1861(b)(7) of the Act provides that if all the physicians who furnishmedical or surgical services to Medicare beneficiaries in the hospitalagree not to bill charges for these services, a teaching hospital may electto be paid on a reasonable cost basis for those services. This provision,as added by section 227 of the Social Security Amendments of 1972 (Pub.L. 92-603), was intended in part to simplify the administration of theprogram by eliminating the need for the hospital to document what portionof the physician's time is attributable to ``medical and surgical services,''and what portion constitutes ``supervision of interns and residents.''This documentation would otherwise be necessary in order to establish whetherthe ``attending physician'' criteria were met, which would allow the physiciansto bill charges under Part B for their medical and surgical services. (SeeS. Rep. No. 1230, 92d Cong., 2d Sess. 198 (1972).) We argued in the proposed rule that we do not believe that section 1861(b)(7)is inconsistent with section 1886(h) of the Act, which, as discussed above,provides that effective with cost reporting periods beginning on or afterJuly 1, 1985, the direct costs of GME will be paid on the basis of perresident amounts, rather than reasonable cost. The per resident amountwill be based on GME costs included in the hospital's intern and residentcost center in a specified base year. For those hospitals that made the election under section 1861(b)(7) forcost reporting periods beginning prior to October 1, 1983, both physicians'medical and surgical services, and any supervision of interns and residentsincident to furnishing the medical and surgical services in a hospital,were treated separately and paid through a special payment arrangementduring the base year. Moreover, as explained above, there is no documentationthat would provide the basis for distinguishing between the time spenton medical services as opposed to supervision. Accordingly, the supervisionof interns and residents under these circumstances will not be reflectedin the per resident amounts for payment of direct GME costs under section1886(h) of the Act, but will be reimbursed separately, on a reasonablecost basis pursuant to the election provided by section 1861(b)(7) of theAct. However, if a hospital made the section 1861(b)(7) election after the FY1984 base year, the costs of supervising interns and residents would havebeen included in the intern and resident cost center, and therefore wereincluded in the calculation of the per resident amount. Thus, the effectof the 1861(b)(7) election would be a duplicate payment for the supervisoryservices. Accordingly, for hospitals that elect the special payment methodfor cost reporting periods beginning on or after the FY 1984 base year,we proposed to adjust the per resident amounts for GME to reflect proportionatelylower costs from those that are represented in the amounts determined forother teaching hospitals, in order to avoid duplicate payments. <ITAG tagnum="81">11. End Stage Renal Disease (ESRD) Exception Criteria </ITAG>Currently, payment for educational costs is included in the composite ratepayment system for outpatient dialysis services. A hospital-based ESRDfacility that incurs costs attributable to an approved residency or nursingeducation program may request an exception to its composite rate payment.To qualify, a hospital-based ESRD facility must incur costs above its compositerate payment that are attributable to its educational program, as describedin andSection; 413.170(g)(3). Section 1881(b)(1) of the Act requires Medicareto pay for institutional dialysis services and supplies. Section 1881(b)(2)(B)of the Act determines how these outpatient dialysis services are paid.Neither of these sections requires Medicare to pay for medical educationalcosts under the composite rate payment system. Under section 1886(h) ofthe Act, however, payment for GME costs in hospital-based ESRD facilitieswould be payable through per resident amounts. Therefore, we proposed thatany costs attributable to approved residency, nursing, and paramedicaltraining programs be excluded from the composite rate. Costs associatedwith approved residency programs would be payable through the per residentamounts. Costs incurred in connection with approved nursing and paramedicaltraining programs would be reimbursable on a reasonable cost basis underthe authority of andSection; 413.85. Such treatment of these costs wouldeliminate the need for exception criteria for the cost of approved educationalactivities. This proposal would be applicable to cost reporting periodsbeginning on or after July 1, 1985, the effective date of section 1886(h)of the Act. In conjunction with this proposal, in order to avoid duplicate paymentsthat might result because of this statutory effective date, we proposedthat it will be necessary to recover or offset any exception amounts alreadypaid that are related to GME programs for cost reporting periods beginningon or after July 1, 1985, since these amounts would be payable throughthe per resident payment established by section 1886(h) of the Act. Asstated in the proposed rule, HCFA would not approve any new composite rateeducational exceptions once the proposed regulations are published in finalin order to prevent overpayments from continuing.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Discussion of Public Comments</ITAG>In response to the proposed rule, we received approximately 75 timely itemsof correspondence. Comments were received from hospitals and hospital associations,professional health-related organizations, intermediaries, and local governments.The specific comments and our responses to them are set forth below.A. General Comments<T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters opposed the change from reasonable costreimbursement to the per resident amount payments. One commenter pointedout that it adds another level of complexity to an already convoluted paymentsystem, and that it does not result in a more equitable system of paymentfor direct GME costs.<T3>Response: </T3>The modified payment system we are implementing wasestablished by Congress in section 9202 of Public Law 99-272. In implementingthis law, we have endeavored to produce as few disruptions as possibleconsistent with Congressional intent.<T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters cited the negative impact on theirhospitals resulting from the retroactive application of section 1886(h)of the Act. One commenter pointed out that hospitals had made GME expendituresin good faith without knowing how the final rule would affect the hospitals'GME costs. Several commenters argued that HCFA should disregard the statutoryeffective date and that HCFA should implement section 1886(h) of the Acton a prospective basis only. One commenter gave an example of other statutoryprovisions in which effective dates were delayed administratively for variousreasons.<T3>Response: </T3>The statute requires that the new GME payment policyis to be effective for hospital cost reporting periods beginning on orafter July 1, 1985. At the time of its enactment in April 1986, section9202 of Public Law 99-272 was already a retroactive provision; that is,its effective date was cost reporting periods beginning on or after July1, 1985. The fact that Congress passed the provision as a retroactive measureis a clear indication of Congressional intent that the statute be implementedretroactively effective with July 1, 1985. Moreover, we infer from theretroactive nature of the statutory provision that Congress viewed themethodology it was enacting as preferable to the methodology on directmedical education payments that the Department had adopted for cost reportingperiods beginning on or after July l, 1985 and intended that the new paymentprovision supersede the July 5, 1985 final rule. (On July 5, 1985, theDepartment published a final rule, effective July 1, 1985, in which allowabledirect medical education costs were to have been limited to the lesserof the hospital's actual costs or the hospital's allowable costs incurredduring a prior base period (51 FR 34790). Moreover, we believe that hospitalshave had adequate notice that their Medicare payments for graduate medicaleducation costs would be limited. Initially, hospitals should have anticipateda ``freeze'' in Medicare GME payments for cost reporting periods beginningon or after July 1, 1985 based on the publication of the July 5, 1985 finalrule. As an interim step pending issuance of this final rule, we notifiedthe public in the May 6, 1986 <T4>Federal Register</T4> that section 9202 of Public Law 99-272 specifieda different approach to payment of direct medical education costs startingwith cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985. Also, we understand that information about the enactment of section 9202of Public Law 99-272 and its provisions was conveyed to teaching hospitalsby their advocacy groups to encourage them to give due consideration toholding down their GME costs. It is obvious from the provisions of thelegislation that Congress intended to place limits on Medicare participationin GME costs, and we believe that teaching hospitals should have been makingdecisions about their GME costs accordingly. Most of the provisions ofthe proposed rule (for example, the CPI-U update factor, the one percentupdate for the first year, and the weighting factors for residents) werespecified in the law and should have been considered by teaching hospitalsat least since the enactment of section 9202 of Public Law 99-272 on April7, 1986. Finally, we note that retroactive application of the new payment provisionswill benefit some hospitals. Some hospitals will benefit from the new methodologyfor apportioning Medicare costs based on Medicare inpatient load and otherswill benefit from the removal of GME costs in making the lower-of cost-or-chargescomparison. Hospitals that incur all or substantially all of the trainingcosts for the time that residents spend in patient care activities outsidethe hospital setting will benefit from recognition of this time in theintern and resident FTE count effective July l, 1987. Hospitals that operatea geriatric training program that receives accreditation from ACGME willbenefit from treatment of the program as approved retroactively to thelater of July l, 1985 or the date the program was established. Failureto implement the provision retroactively would deny these hospitals thebenefits to which they are entitled by statute. (Additional discussionof the circumstances that require retroactive application of this finalrule is provided in section VI below.)<T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that the revised payment methodshould apply only to hospitals subject to the prospective payment systemand disagreed with our proposal to apply section 1886(h) of the Act toall hospitals and hospital-based providers and subproviders. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that it is clear from the language of section1886(h) of the Act that it applies to all hospitals regardless of theirstatus under the prospective payment system. Nowhere in that section isthere any indication that Congress intended that it apply only to thosehospitals paid under the provision of section 1886(d) of the Act. On thecontrary, section 1886(h) of the Act refers only to ``hospitals'' or to``a hospital with an approved medical residency training program,'' whereasthe provisions in section 1886(d) of the Act concerning the prospectivepayment system usually refer instead to a ``subsection (d) hospital'' orto a ``subsection (d) Puerto Rico hospital.'' (Those terms are definedin sections 1886(d)(1)(B) and 1886(d)(9)(A) of the Act.) Further, subsection(h) of section 1886 of the Act is the only subsection of that section thathas a heading, ``Payment for Direct Graduate Medical Education Costs.''This unusual feature is a further indication that the provisions of subsection(h) are to be distinguished from the provisions on the prospective paymentsystem (and related payment provisions) that are set forth in the precedingsubsections of section 1886 of the Act. Thus, it seems clear that section1886(h) of the Act was not intended to be limited to hospitals receivingpayment under the prospective payment system. As discussed in the proposedrule at 53 FR 36590, we believe that it would be impractical not to applythe revised payment method to the entire healthcare complex. Any alternativewould be too burdensome on all parties to administer. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter stated that the change in payment methodbreaks a promise made by the Medicare program to pay for GME costs andwill force hospitals to pass GME costs on to other payers. <T3>Response: </T3>As noted above, these rules are necessary to implementlegislation passed by Congress. We believe that when the three-fold Medicareresponse to GME programs is considered (that is, direct medical educationpayments, indirect medical education payments, and attending physicianbilling), there will continue to be a considerable commitment of Medicarefunds to GME programs. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter indicated that the retroactive applicationdisrupts finality of payments under the prospective payment system.<T3>Response: </T3>We do not believe this to be the case. We are instructingfiscal intermediaries to review GME base period amounts for the purposeof making the payments under the final rule as correct as possible forthe future. Since payment for GME has been made as a pass-through costrather than as part of the prospective payment rate, these payments (aswith all other amounts paid on a reasonable cost basis) were always subjectto reopening by intermediaries in appropriate cases within three yearsof settlement to correct erroneous payment. This would be the case, andhas been taking place, independent of the enactment of section 1886(h)of the Act. As for the finality of payments made under the prospectivepayment system, the only payments that will be affected are hospital-specificpayments during the transition period and this will be done at the requestof a hospital for the benefit of the hospital for those cost reportingperiods that are subject to reopening. B. Determining Base-Period per Resident Amounts <T3>Comment:</T3> Many commenters addressed the need to have consistencyin the counting of resident FTE's between the base period and the paymentperiods and cited the individual circumstances of their hospitals withrespect to funding sources of residency programs. A particular problemreferred to was the treatment of residents who are paid by medical schools,faculty practice plans, and others rather than by hospitals that participatein Medicare. It was pointed out that teaching hospitals incur other costssuch as teaching physicians' salaries and overhead costs in connectionwith these residents, and that it would be unfair not to count these residentsfor payment purposes. One commenter suggested that residents who are paid a salary by nonhospitalentities be counted as .25 FTE in recognition of these costs while anotherindicated that the GME costs not associated with residents' salaries werehigher than the salary costs. A commenter from a major academic healthcenter recommended that the one-day count of residents taken each Septemberfor indirect medical education payment purposes be weighted for individualresidents as set forth in section 1886(h) of the Act and used for directGME payment purposes also. The commenter pointed out that if that countwas accurate enough for indirect medical education purposes, which involvemuch larger payments, it should suffice for direct GME payments as well.<T3>Response: </T3>As we stated in the preamble to the proposed rule, thecount of residents is the most complicated aspect of implementing section1886(h) of the Act. Section 1886(h)(2)(A) of the Act states:<ITAG tagnum="21">The Secretary shall determine for the hospital's cost reporting periodthat began during fiscal year 1984, the average amount recognized as reasonableunder this title for direct graduate medical education costs of the hospitalfor each full-time-equivalent resident.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">As provided in section 1886(h)(3)(B) of the Act, the requirement fordetermining payments for cost reporting periods beginning on or after July1, 1985 is that the updated per resident amount is multiplied by ``* ** the weighted average number of full-time-equivalent residents * * * inthe hospital's approved medical residency training programs in that period.''Nothing in section 1886(h) of the Act indicates that the bearing of certaintypes of costs in connection with particular residents is a factor in determiningwho should be counted. The law simply requires the Secretary to determinethe average amount incurred to train residents during the specified baseperiod and to make GME payments for the residents in the hospital's programsthereafter on that basis. There was no authorization to establish a two-tieredsystem to account both for residents for whom the hospital incurs fulltraining costs and for residents for whom hospitals incur only supervisoryand overhead costs because the residents' salaries are paid by anotherentity. Not only does section 1886(h) of the Act not take into account the varioustypes of financial arrangements that teaching hospitals have made for theirGME programs, it also does not provide for reasonable modification of programarrangements after the base period. Thus, depending on the compositionof GME costs during the base period, some teaching hospitals that laterdecide to change the financing of their GME programs could experience windfallprofits, while others could experience a shortfall of the Medicare fundingto which they had become accustomed. In short, the revised payment methodis less flexible in responding to change than was reasonable cost reimbursement.In responding to the various comments received, we would like to stressthat we agree that there should be consistency between the residents countedin the base period and in the payment periods. The primary difference betweenthe count of residents in the base period and in the payment years shouldbe increases or reductions in the numbers of FTE residents in approvedprograms in the hospital during the cost reporting periods in question.The problem is how to count the residents in such a way that hospitalsare treated as fairly as possible given the restrictions imposed by therevised payment method. The revised payment method set forth in section 1886(h) of the Act seemsto assume that GME programs remain relatively static except for upwardand downward movements in the number of residents in a program. Carriedfurther, the assumption seems to be that there is fairly constant rotationof residents to other hospitals, and that the exchange of funds betweenprogram hospitals on a yearly basis is also fairly constant. While theapparent assumptions stated above would seem to argue for the use of auniform one-day count of residents as has been the case with indirect medicaleducation payments since cost reporting periods beginning on or after October1, 1984, we have reservations about this approach. Specifically, we haveconcerns about proper application of the weighting factors across teachinghospitals. For residents beyond their initial residency period and forforeign medical graduates who have not passed FMGEMs, we have no assurancethat the assignments of such residents on September l each year is actuallyreflective of the entire year. We believe that this is a much more importantconsideration with direct medical education payments than with indirectmedical education payments since GME payments will be reduced for thesecategories of residents. The indirect medical education payments are madeto teaching hospitals regardless of the weighting factors. We proposed to use the number of residents shown on the Medicare cost reportfor the base period as the denominator in calculating a base-period perresident amount for each teaching hospital. Although one of the numbersentered on the cost report was for the purpose of calculating indirectmedical education payments, the total number reported applied to the entirehealth care complex including hospital-based providers and subproviderseven though the indirect medical education payment did not apply to theseresidents. We concede that some commenters on the proposed rule were confused by ourdiscussion of indirect medical education numbers in the preamble (see 53FR 36593). We did not mean that the number used for indirect medical educationpayments was to be used as the denominator but the number entered on thecost report for the complex as a whole under indirect medical educationcounting procedures was to be used. However, in response to the commenters' concern that the base-period countof residents be consistent with the method of counting residents for costreporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985, we are modifyingproposed andSection; 413.86(e)(1) to specify that fiscal intermediaries willuse a count of FTE residents for the GME base period that reflects theaverage number of FTE residents working in the health care complex duringthe GME base period. The residents' assignment schedules for the GME baseperiod should already be included in the fiscal intermediary work paperssince these assignment schedules were to be used to verify the ``assignedtime'' or ``FTE'' statistics on Worksheet B-1 of the cost report whichwere used to allocate the GME cost to the various cost centers. If suchdocumentation is not included in the fiscal intermediary work papers, thehospital will be required to present additional documentation to determinea base year count of residents consistent with the counting of residentsafter July 1, 1985. This information must be in a format that may be verifiedby the intermediary. Several commenters were concerned that their base-period per resident amountswould be too low if the count entered on the FY 1984 cost report were usedas the denominator since varying percentages of their residents receivedtheir salaries from other entities. The commenters argued that when theseresidents, for whom the hospital incurs certain nonsalary costs, are combinedwith residents for whom they incur full training costs, the hospital'sbase-period amount will be too low. We believe that this should not bea problem if the same financial arrangements apply in the payment years.The fact that one teaching hospital's per resident amount is significantlylower than another hospital's is immaterial if it accurately reflects base-yearcosts, unless the financial arrangements are changed. However, we note that some of the comments have led us to believe that,in addition to Federally-employed residents (for example, residents inVeterans Administration or Department of Defense programs), a significantnumber of residents are paid a salary by non-Federal, nonprovider entities(for example, medical schools or philanthropic agencies). As noted by thecommenters, although no hospital participating in Medicare incurs salarycosts for these residents, hospitals do incur other substantial GME costsassociated with these residents. Therefore, we are modifying our proposedrule to require Medicare hospitals to count residents who are working intheir facility even if the residents' salaries are fully paid by otherentities, either Federal or nonFederal. This revised counting policy willapply to both the GME base period and cost reporting periods subject tothe new payment methodology. Finally, we reject the comment of substituting a fractional FTE count forresidents who are paid a salary by nonhospital entities in both the baseperiod and the payment years, because the financing of GME programs variesso widely as to preclude arriving at an appropriate uniform figure. Thefollowing examples are provided to illustrate the counting of residentsunder the revised GME payment methodology: <ITAG tagnum="74">EXAMPLE 1: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In its GME base period (cost reporting period beginning July 1, 1984),teaching hospital A had 502 residents filling 500 slots in its variousGME programs (4 residents share 2 slots). Hospital A is a health care complexthat also includes a skilled nursing facility (SNF), a comprehensive outpatientrehabilitation facility (CORF), and a home health agency (HHA). Teachinghospital A paid the salaries of 402 residents while the remaining 100 residentshad their salaries paid by another entity. The assignment of the 502 residentswas as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/>  <H1>Number of residents </H1><H1>Salary paid by </H1><H1>Where assigned (percent of time)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">1. 198 <D>Hospital A </D><D>Prospective payment unit of Hospital A_100%. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. 4 (sharing 2 slots) <D>Hospital A </D><D>Prospective payment unit of Hospital A_50%. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. 10 <D>Hospital A </D><D>Prospective payment unit of Hospital A_50%; Excluded units of HospitalA_50%. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. 10 <D>Hospital A </D><D>Prospective payment unit of Hospital A_50%; Freestanding clinic_50%.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. 180 <D>Hospital A </D><D>Prospective payment unit of Hospital A_50%; On rotation at other hospitals_50%.</D></ITAG>Total 402 <D> </D><D> </D><ITAG tagnum="1">6. 80 <D>Medical school </D><D>Prospective payment unit of Hospital A_75%; SNF, CORF, HHA of HospitalA_25%. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7. 20 <D>Veterans' Administration </D><D>Prospective payment unit of Hospital A; 25%; On rotation at other hospitals_75%.</D></ITAG>Total 100 <D> </D><D/></ITAG>For the purpose of calculating Teaching Hospital A's base-period per residentamount, the total number of residents to be included in the denominatoris 390, computed as follows: (Line 1)+(Line 2andmultiply;0.5)+(Line 3)+(Line4andmultiply;0.5)+(Line 5andmultiply;0.5)+(Line 6)+(Line 7andmultiply;0.25)=198+2+10+5+90+80+5=390.If we assume that the number of residents remains the same in all futureyears, and that all residents are within their initial residency periods,and that all foreign medical graduates have passed FMGEMS or its equivalent,then for the cost reporting period beginning July 1, 1986, Hospital A wouldcount 390 residents for payment purposes under the new payment methodology.Effective July 1, 1987, Hospital A would count 395 residents since thehospital incurs substantially all of the costs for the 10 residents thatspend 50 percent of their time in freestanding clinics. If Hospital A didnot incur substantially all of the costs for the 10 residents, the hospitalwould continue to count 390 residents (and no payment would be made tothe hospital for the time the residents spend in freestanding clinics).<ITAG tagnum="74">Example 2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Hospital B does not have a GME program; however, at any given time,20 residents from approved programs at other hospitals are on rotationat Hospital B. The other hospitals pay the salaries of all 20 residents.The other hospitals cannot count the residents for the portion of theirtime they spend at Hospital B. Hospital B compensates one hospital a fixedamount per month for each of 10 residents provided by the hospital. HospitalB is not required to provide any compensation for the other 10 residents.For the purpose of calculating Hospital B's base period per resident amount,the total number of residents to be included in the denominator is 20.(The costs are the costs incurred by Hospital B for the 20 residents; thatis, the amounts paid to the other hospital and the nonsalary costs incurredby Hospital B.) If we assume that the number of residents remains the sameover time, and that all residents count as 1.0 FTE in future periods, thenfor cost reporting periods subject to the new payment methodology, HospitalB would also count 20 residents for payment purposes.</ITAG><T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters objected to the use of the indirectmedical education count in calculating the base period per resident amounts,and suggested that residents assigned to excluded units such as psychiatricunits be included in both the base year and payment year counts. <T3>Response: </T3>As was discussed above, it has been our intention allalong to count residents assigned to excluded units, hospital-based skillednursing facilities, and other providers and subproviders of the healthcare complex. Proposed andSection; 413.86(e)(1) did not specify that theindirect medical education count be used in the calculation. Rather, itspecified that the number of residents reported on the cost report shouldbe used. Residents assigned to excluded units are reported on the costreport. To clarify this point, we are adding an additional sentence toandSection; 413.86(e)(1), in addition to the changes discussed above, tomake it clear that all residents reported for all components of the complex(other than residents hired to replace anesthetists, as provided in andSection;413.85(d)(7)) would be counted in calculating base-period amounts. In addition,we are classifying in andSection; 413.86(f) how residents, including thoseworking part-time and on rotation, will be counted in the payment years.<T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters indicated that there were problemswith using the indirect medical education count of residents in the baseperiod since the count of residents assigned to the hospital as of thefirst working day in September is independent of the payment of salaries.<T3>Response:</T3> We believe the commenters are confused about the methodused in the base-period count of residents. The base period for determiningper resident amounts under section 1886(h) of the Act is the cost reportingperiod beginning in FY 1984. At that time, the one-day September countwas not the basis upon which the indirect medical education count was made.Rather, the indirect medical education count was based on the number ofresidents working at the hospital and employed by either this hospitalor by an organization that has a longstanding medical relationship withthe hospital and that is the sole employer of substantially all the residentsfurnishing services at the hospital. However, as was discussed above, we are modifying andSection; 413.86(e)(1),in response to commenters' concerns, to specify that fiscal intermediarieswill use a count of FTE residents for the base period that reflects theaverage number of FTE residents working in the health care complex duringthe base period. <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters pointed out that the 35-hour a weekthreshold was applied to the indirect medical education count on the costreport that will be used for the GME base-period calculation and couldaffect the base-period amount. It was suggested that hospitals should beallowed to adjust their base-period FTE counts to take this factor intoaccount. <T3>Response:</T3> As discussed above, we proposed to use the count ofresidents entered on the cost report under indirect medical education provisionfor all components of the complex because that number was available. However,based on comments received, we are modifying andSection; 413.86(e)(1)(i)of the proposed rule to specify that fiscal intermediaries will use a countof FTE residents for the GME base period that reflects the average numberof FTE residents working in the health care complex during the GME baseperiod. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter indicated that HCFA's concern about thecorrectness of GME base period costs is unfounded since there was extensiveaudit activity of these costs for both the prospective payment base periodand the first cost reporting year of the prospective payment system. <T3>Response:</T3> It may not be necessary to reaudit all teaching hospitalsin setting the base-period rates. However, several situations have beenbrought to our attention in which physicians' costs incurred for activitiesunrelated to GME, malpractice costs, and medical library costs have beenmisclassified as GME costs or excessive administrative and general servicecosts were allocated to the GME cost center. Thus, we believe that thereis a basis for reaudit activity where indicated. <T3>Comment:</T3> Some commenters were concerned that some records necessaryto support payments made in the base period may no longer be available,and that since most hospitals have already undergone audits, the commentersbelieve that they should be given the benefit of the doubt when supportingdocumentation is unavailable. The commenters also pointed out that, withrespect to section 1886(h)(4)(E) of the Act, which permits the countingof the time residents spend in nonhospital settings for the teaching hospitalthat bears the training costs of the residents in the outside setting onor after July 1, 1987, some hospitals would be unable to document fromtheir affiliation agreements which entity paid the residents' salaries.<T3>Response:</T3> Obviously, all records used to support the reimbursementof costs are not of equal importance in determining the allowability andclassification of costs. While it may be necessary at some point for HCFAto set a policy on this issue, we would find it hard to believe that teachinghospitals would not have some supporting documentation of costs incurredno more than 5 years ago. Furthermore, even if the information is no longeravailable at the hospital, the fiscal intermediary would have retainedsome of the documentation in its workpapers. With respect to the provision effective July 1, 1987, the only requirementis for documentation that the hospital pays for the training costs, specificallyresidents' salaries, in the outside setting. If hospitals cannot documentthat they incurred salary costs for certain residents in 1987, they shouldnot receive GME payments for those individuals.<T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked for clarification of why we wouldreopen cost reports that had been settled for more than 3 years if no adjustmentsto amounts paid in that year could be made. <T3>Response: </T3>The commenter is referring to our proposed policy toallow hospitals who have had misclassified operating costs removed fromtheir GME base period costs to request an upward adjustment to their hospitalspecific rate (HSR) during the prospective payment transition period reflectingthese higher operating costs. If costs that were misclassified as GME inthe GME base-period costs received similar treatment in the prospectivepayment base period, there would be a basis for an upward adjustment ofthe hospital's HSR. To make this adjustment, it is necessary to use thecost report from the prospective payment base period even though paymentsin that year might not be affected. The affected years would be those costreporting periods subject to reopening in which the HSR was a factor inthe hospital's payments under the usual provisions of andSection; 405.1885(that is, within 3 years of settlement). <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters argued that hospitals that are excludedfrom the prospective payment system should be permitted to request to havetheir target amount recomputed to reflect misclassified costs in the sameway prospective payment hospitals may request to have their HSRs recomputed.<T3>Response: </T3>We agree with the commenters that this adjustment shouldbe made. We are revising the proposed regulations to include this provision(see andSection; 413.86(j)). <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter objected ``* * * to legislation which,for the government's convenience, allows a modification to the hospitalspecific base rule for any errors found to be applied retroactively, whiledenying hospitals retroactive application to all other known errors (thosesupported by successful appeals).'' <T3>Response: </T3>There is nothing in section 1886(h) of the Act thataddresses the recomputation of HSRs. However, we believed that the enactmentof section 9202 of Public Law 99-272 was a special circumstance callingfor special treatment of the costs involved. Under both situations in whichwe have proposed recomputation of HSRs, the recomputation works to thebenefit of the hospitals involved. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter questioned whether the proposed reopeningof cost reports will allow areas other than GME to be reopened. <T3>Response: </T3>As indicated in the proposed rule at 53 FR 36592, weare making a one-time adjustment solely for the purposes of correctly classifyingGME costs. We do not intend that any other areas of the cost report bereopened. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several comments oppose the review and potential reopeningof cost reporting periods beginning in FY 1984 for the purpose of settingbase-period per resident amounts. One commenter representing a group ofphysicians pointed out that Congress made the clear-cut decision that thefigures for that year would serve as the base period and expressed concernthat different standards would be applied on audit that were not appliedoriginally. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 1886(h)(2)(A) of the Act provides that the Secretarymust determine, for the cost reporting period that began during FY 1984,the average amount recognized as reasonable. We would find it hard to believethat Congress intended that misclassified and nonallowable costs continueto be recognized through the GME payment indefinitely. The first cost reportingperiod under the prospective payment system will serve as the base periodfor the new GME payment policy. We believe that GME costs were not givensufficient scrutiny at the time because of the many changes that were takingplace in Medicare generally. We would like to assure all interested partiesthat no new reimbursement principles will be applied during the reaudit.Rather, our intent is to ensure that the reimbursement principles in effectduring the GME base period were correctly applied. Moreover, we are clarifyingandSection; 413.86(e)(1) to indicate that if a hospital's base-period costreport is no longer subject to reopening under andSection; 405.1885, theintermediary may modify the hospital's GME base-period costs solely forpurposes of computing the per resident amount. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter requested clarification of whether theproposed rule permits recalculation of the prospective payment base-periodrate and adjustments to reimbursement for all years since the beginningof the prospective payment system. <T3>Response: </T3>Even if section 1886(h) of the Act had never been enacted,intermediaries would have had the authority to reopen cost reports within3 years of settlement to correct erroneous direct medical education pass-throughcost reimbursement amounts. What the proposed rule does is to allow hospitalsto request to have their HSR adjusted upward whenever the retroactive disallowanceof misclassified GME costs would result in no payment for what are otherwiseallowable operating costs of the hospital, (that is, an overpayment thatthe Medicare program otherwise would have to recover). Adjustments to theHSR (and the target rate for hospitals excluded from the prospective paymentsystem) will be made for cost reporting periods that are still subjectto reopening (that is, within 3 years of settlement) under the usual provisionsof andSection; 405.1885. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter pointed out that the proposed rule permitslimited revision to the HSR, but there is no discussion of the effect onFederal rates. <T3>Response: </T3>The Federal portion of the prospective payment ratesin effect during the transition period will not be revised as part of thisfinal rule. We believe it would be inappropriate to change all hospitals'prospective payments retroactively to take account of changes to a subsetof teaching hospitals' costs. The prospective payment system, as legislatedby Congress, was designed to set payments in advance, and payment rateswere established based on the best data available at the time.<T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that, during any reaudit activity,hospitals should be able to introduce additional GME costs not previouslyclaimed, as well as misclassified costs, to augment base-period GME costs.<T3>Response: </T3>We would seriously question the legitimacy of costsintroduced 4 or 5 years after the base-period cost report was preparedby the hospital. However, if it can be demonstrated to the satisfactionof the fiscal intermediary that legitimate GME costs were inadvertentlyomitted from the base-period cost report, then these costs could be introducedduring the reaudit activity. However, these costs would have to be supportedby actual documentation developed during the GME base-period that was maintainedin a format that can be audited. Costs other than GME costs could not beintroduced if the cost report is not otherwise subject to being reopened.<T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter pointed out that the GME base period costsinclude capital costs properly allocated to GME programs and raised a numberof issues arising from the fact that capital payments related to GME willbe limited by the CPI-U on the same basis as GME payments generally. Itwas noted that such a limit on capital payments related to GME ultimatelyrestricts growth and does not take into consideration future expansionand increases in debt. <T3>Response: </T3>It is true that the revised GME payment method establishedby section 1886(h) of the Act locks into place a teaching hospital's costcircumstances as they existed during the base period with no provisionfor modifying per resident amounts to reflect changes in those circumstances.We infer from the lack of an exception for capital or any other categoryof costs related to GME programs that it was the intent of the Congressto do this. The practical result of this policy is to preclude additionalpayments for capital costs related to GME for cost reporting periods beginningon or after July 1, 1985, except to the extent such costs might be payablethrough per resident amounts. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters questioned the need for reaudit activityof GME base-period costs since there is no reason to believe that the resultswould be more consistent on reaudit than they were after the original audit.<T3>Response: </T3>Periodically, findings have come to our attention thatindicate that fiscal intermediaries were inconsistent in their applicationof GME policy under reasonable cost reimbursement. The enactment of section1886(h) of the Act, with its potential to perpetuate misclassified andnonallowable costs through the per resident amounts, compels us to takeactions to strive for consistent treatment of GME costs. Reaudit guidelinesfor the intermediaries have been prepared by HCFA. We believe that thereaudits will clear up these problems. <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters expressed concern about treatment ofGME costs of a related medical school. One commenter pointed out that,in some complexes, GME activities may take place in space assigned to themedical school, and that it would be unfair to impose a restriction onthe location of allowable GME patient care activities in large academichealth care centers for reimbursement purposes. Another commenter was concernedthat medical schools often are adequately funded by grants from State andlocal governments, so it seems inappropriate for the medical school undersuch circumstances to also pass-through such costs to the hospital. Inthe opinion of the commenter, we should address whether there is a redistributionof GME costs when State appropriations or other funding sources are sufficientto cover the costs of operating the medical school.<T3>Response: </T3>We agree that determination of allowable costs of relatedmedical schools can be a complicated matter. We are guided by the generalprinciple that, to be allowable at all, the costs must be related to patientcare furnished in the hospital, and, to be allowable as a direct GME cost,the costs must be related to the GME program in the hospital. Certain identifiableactivities conducted by the faculty of a related medical school, whichare necessary for the clinical training function at the hospital, may representallowable costs for Medicare program purposes. These activities includesupervision of interns and residents in activities for which no Part Bcharge is made and the conducting of rounds and patient care conferencesrelated to hospital patients. To reiterate, services that are both relatedto the care and treatment of the hospital's patients and furnished in supportof the training of interns and residents meet the requirements for payment.These items and services must be necessary and directly related to theprovision of medical school faculty services in the hospital and may notbe duplicative of items and services furnished by the hospital. For example,if the hospital is unable to provide office space or clerical support tothe physicians supervising its interns and residents, a portion of thosecosts that are incurred by the university medical school may be allowableif it can be demonstrated to the satisfaction of the fiscal intermediarythat such costs are directly related to the training program of the internsand residents working in the university hospital and are related to thecare and treatment of the hospital's patients. In the past, hospitals have alleged that the related organization principleset forth in andSection; 413.17 requires Medicare to reimburse a hospitalfor a share of all costs of a medical complex or even of the entire universityon the basis that the component entities were indistinguishable from thewhole. Our policy concerning related organizations was established to avoidprogram recognition of costs of a provider for services furnished by arelated organization in excess of the costs incurred by the related organization,and to avoid payment of artificially inflated costs that might be generatedfrom less than arm's length bargaining. This policy was not intended toexpand the range of items and services for which a provider could claimMedicare reimbursement, or to include items and services not specificallyrelated to patient care. With respect to the comment that we should address the issue of fundingthat covers the costs of operating the medical school, our policy priorto October l, 1983 provided that restricted grants (those grants that weredesignated by the donor for paying certain specified provider costs) werededucted from the designated costs incurred by the provider. Unrestrictedcontributions, however, would not be deducted from such costs. Section901 of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1980 (Pub. L. 96-499) addedsection 1134 of the Act. This provision affirmed the Secretary's authoritynot to offset donor-restricted grants and gifts that the Secretary finds,in the best interests of needed health care, should be encouraged. Thepolicy that restricted grants could be offset against allowable costs incurredby providers was changed effective October l, 1983 (as provided in theSeptember l, 1983 final rule (48 FR 39797)). Thereafter, any grant moniesreceived by a provider could not be offset against the reimbursable amountsdue the provider under Medicare. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that a date should be set bywhich intermediaries must decide whether a cost report should be reopenedbased on findings made during reaudit activity so that hospitals will notbe penalized due to the tardiness of their intermediaries' actions. <T3>Response: </T3>We do not agree. As pointed out in the preamble to theproposed rule, budgetary restraints that have been placed on contractorsmake specific time schedules for this activity impractical. We will, however,begin this review and reaudit as soon as possible after publication ofthis final rule. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter indicated that the 3-year restriction onreopening cost reports should not be waived for the reaudit activity andthe consistency requirement of the regulations for direct medical educationcosts during the prospective payment system transition period should beapplied in defining GME costs on a per resident basis. <T3>Response: </T3>We would like to reiterate that payments will not beaffected for cost reporting periods that have been settled for more thanthree years. Rather, we proposed that cost reports settled for more than3 years could be re-examined for purposes of modifying the hospital's targetamount or HSR in subsequent years still subject to reopening. With respectto the second part of the comment, the consistency clause in andSection;412.113(b) was never intended to recognize operating costs misclassifiedas GME costs. It was designed to prevent hospitals from claiming amountson a reasonable cost basis for the types of costs already included in itsHSR. As part of the September 30, 1988 prospective payment system finalrule, we removed the portion of andSection; 412.113(b) dealing with the consistencyrule for medical education costs. With the expiration of the transitionperiod, the restrictions on the classification of medical education costswere no longer needed for cost reporting periods beginning on or afterOctober 1, 1987. We removed this requirement so it would not be confusingin future cost reporting periods. However, we now believe that the requirementfor consistent treatment of medical education costs during the transitionperiod should remain in the regulations to enhance understanding of thetreatment of misclassified costs for purposes of determining the GME perresident amount and adjusting the HSR. Therefore, we are making the changesas proposed to andSection; 412.113 and retaining in andSection; 412.113(b)(3)the consistency rule for medical education costs. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter expressed concern with the proposal toreview, and, in some cases, reaudit GME base period costs because of an``* * * arbitrary and capricious application of a `suspicion' by fiscalintermediaries that such costs are high.''<T3>Response: </T3>The GME base period under section 1886(h) of the Actwas also the first period under the prospective payment system, a periodin which many changes were occurring in the Medicare program. The coststhat were classified as costs of approved educational activities did notalways receive the scrutiny they should have. Several instances of misclassifiedcosts have come to our attention, and we believe that it is necessary tocorrect these errors before incorporating these FY 1984 costs into theper resident amounts that will not be revised again except by an updatefactor. Because of this, we believe that it is imperative that we do ourbest to ensure that these amounts are correct. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that different per resident amountsbe established for each type of specialty program to reflect the differingcosts of the programs. <T3>Response: </T3>The revised payment method established by section 1886(h)of the Act made no provision for such differentiation. Further, it wouldbe extremely difficult to calculate such amounts from Medicare cost reportssince the costs of all GME programs are aggregated within one cost centeron the cost report. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter requested clarification as to how overheadwould be apportioned between GME programs and nursing and allied healthtraining programs. <T3>Response: </T3>All overhead associated with GME programs will be payableonly through the per resident amount, regardless of the actual costs incurred,based on the overhead costs during the base period. Overhead costs incurredin connection with approved nursing and allied health training programswill continue to be reimbursed on a reasonable cost basis under existingcost report procedures. <T3>Comment: </T3>We were asked to elaborate on the appeals  process withrespect to the computation of the per resident amount. One commenter suggestedthat a hospital be permitted to make an initial appeal to the fiscal intermediarywithin 180 days of receipt of the notice of its per resident amount. Then,if still dissatisfied,  the hospital could appeal to the Provider ReimbursementReview Board (PRRB) within 180 days of the revised notice. <T3>Response: </T3>Once the intermediary computes a per resident amountthat the intermediary believes is correct, the intermediary will notifythe hospital that this is HCFA's final determination. Upon receipt of thisnotification, the hospital has 180 days in which to appeal the intermediary'sdetermination. Although the hospital must appeal to the PRRB, it can continueto negotiate with the intermediary to resolve any dispute with respectto the intermediary's determination. The hospital has no appeal rightsafter 180 days have elapsed since its receipt of the original notice orany revised notice of its per resident amount. (A revised notice wouldbe issued in response to further negotiation between the hospital and theintermediary, as a result of the issuance of a revised Notice of ProgramReimbursement for the GME base period at a later date, or in response toa PRRB or court determination.) It should be noted that the per residentamount determination process is separate from the settlement of GME paymentsmade on or after July l, 1985. For settlement of GME payments made on orafter July l, 1985, the hospital can still appeal the count of residentsfor the cost reporting year in question or the application of the updatefactor in the settlement of GME payments. We are modifying andSection; 413.86(e)(1)to further clarify these points. C. Updating Per Resident Amount in Subsequent Years <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that the CPI-U, which we proposedto use to update per resident amounts for cost reporting years beginningon or after July 1, 1986, will always be less than actual inflation andsalary increases. The commenter proposed that the CPI-U should be replacedby a factor representing the average increase in GME costs among teachinghospitals. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 1886(h)(2)(d) of the Act specifically requiresthat per resident amounts be updated yearly based on the estimated percentagechange in the Consumer Price Index. Section 1886(h)(5)(B) of the Act definesthe Consumer Price Index as the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers(United States city average (CPI-U)). Therefore, we believe we are barredby the statute from setting any update factor other than the CPI-U. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter indicated that the precedent set in thepast 5 years by the update factors established for the prospective paymentsystem leads the commenter to anticipate that the update factors for GMEcosts will not be reflective of costs.<T3>Response: </T3>As noted above, the update factor (that is, the CPI-U)to be applied to GME payments is established by section 1886(h) of theAct. The factor itself is determined by another component of the Federalgovernment (that is, the Secretary of Labor.) We note that the update factorsfor the prospective payment system are not based on the CPI-U. Therefore,we do not believe that comparisons between the two update factors can bemade. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter opposed our policy to not use an updatefactor for base cost reporting periods beginning from July 1 through September30, 1984, alleged that the one percent update factor applicable for thefirst cost reporting period beginning on or after July 1, 1985 was arbitraryand without substantiated support, objected to the application of the revisedpayment methodology to outpatient departments, and suggested that the GMEbase period be established for cost reporting periods beginning in FY 1990rather than FY 1984. Another commenter suggested that the one percent updatefor the first payment year be replaced by the CPI-U, as is the case withsubsequent years. <T3>Response: </T3>All of the provisions to which the commenter is objectingare based on the provisions of section 1886(h) of the Act. The point ofhaving an update factor for the base period is to account for the inflationin an intervening period between the base period and the first paymentperiod. Hospitals with cost reporting periods beginning from July 1 throughSeptember 30, 1984 do not have such an intervening period thus eliminatingthe need for an update factor. While the commenters may be dissatisfiedwith the one percent update factor, the figure was established by Congress,as was the effective date of the legislation and its application to hospitaloutpatient settings. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that HCFA should quantify theupdate factors to be used for cost reporting periods beginning on or afterJuly 1, 1986 and establish a publication date of the update factors tobe applied to future periods. <T3>Response: </T3>We agree. We plan to publish actual and projected updatefactors in an annual notice that will be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> before July 1 of every year in order that hospitalswill be able to plan accordingly. The update factors for the cost reportingperiods beginning on or after July 1, 1986 are listed in Table 1 of theappendix to this final rule. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that use of the CPI-U updatefactor be replaced by indexes more closely related to the inflation experiencedby teaching hospitals such as the hospital market basket index or the CPI-Ufor the geographic area in which the hospital is located. <T3>Response: </T3>As explained in detail above, section 1886(h)(2) and(h)(5)(B) of the Act require the use of the increase in the CPI for allteaching hospitals. We do not believe that we have the authority to interpretthose provisions of the law in any other manner. D. Counting Residents in Years Subject to the Revised GME Policy <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter pointed out that fully counting all residentsin the base period while applying the initial residency period weightingfactors in subsequent years will create an automatic decrease in payments.<T3>Response: </T3>We believe that this was clearly the intent of Congressas the language of sections 1886(h)(2)(A) and (h)(4)(C) of the Act leavesus no discretion in implementing these provisions. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter indicated that the application to pastperiods of weighting factors for graduates of foreign medical-schools andresidents no longer in initial residency periods would be inequitable,and the factors should be applied on a prospective basis only. <T3>Response: </T3>As has been pointed out previously, section 9202 ofPublic Law 99-272 was a retroactive provision when it was enacted, andwe believe that Congress intended that the factors be applied as indicatedin section 1886(h) of the Act to achieve the intended savings from therevised payment methodology.<T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter requested that we change our proposal tocount a resident for only the hospital in which he or she spent the majorityof the month to a prorated count between the hospitals. <T3>Response:</T3> We agree. We had originally believed that a monthlycount would be significantly less burdensome than a daily or hourly count,or a count on any other basis. However, in order to attribute the countof a resident to the hospital in which the resident spent the majorityof the month, sufficient documentation would be required so that proratingthe resident across hospitals would probably not require that much additionaltime and effort. Therefore, we will instruct hospitals and fiscal intermediariesto apportion the time spent by each resident among the hospitals basedon the number of days (or portions of days if necessary) worked at eachfacility. It will be necessary for the hospital to maintain documentationacceptable to the fiscal intermediary to verify that no resident is countedas more than one FTE during the graduate medical education academic year,regardless of the number of hospitals in which he or she is providing servicesor the total number of hours of service provided. <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters suggested that the problem of countingrotating residents would be best resolved by making all payments to thehospital that is the primary sponsor of the program. One commenter pointedout that, while some hospitals would not be paid for costs they incur forteaching and supervision of the residents, they would be adequately ``repaid''by the services provided by residents to the patients at that hospital.<T3>Response:</T3> Section 1886(h)(2) of the Act requires that ``The Secretaryshall determine, for each hospital with an approved medical residency trainingprogram, an approved FTE resident amount * * *.'' We do not believe thatwe have the authority to restrict the number of hospitals for which anapproved FTE resident amount will be computed. <T3>Comment:</T3> In the preamble to the proposed rule (53 FR 36596), HCFArequested comments on methods by which intermediaries can ensure that thetime spent by residents who are assigned to work in nonhospital settingsand who will be counted under section 1886(h)(4)(E) of the Act is spentin patient care activities. Some commenters argued that it was not necessaryto establish criteria for verification that the time residents spend innonhospital settings is spent in patient care activities. It was pointedout that this would establish a separate standard for those residents thatwould not apply to residents in hospital settings and, in any case, theoverwhelming majority of time spent in these settings is related to patientcare. One commenter suggested that the time be documented by residents'logs of their activities. Another commenter stated that any verificationeffort should require minimum documentation. It was suggested that it wasenough for the hospital to certify that all requirements of the residencyprogram are being satisfied by the training in nonhospital settings. <T3>Response:</T3> We have reviewed the comments, some of which recommendedextensive recordkeeping that we believe is unnecessary, and have decidedthat it is not necessary to account for every hour the resident spendsin nonhospital settings. Essentially, section 1886(h)(4)(E) of the Actsimply ensures that the FTE amount attributable to an individual residentis not reduced below 1.0 simply because he or she is assigned to a freestandingclinic for a portion of his or her residency program. Therefore, we arenot changing our original proposal that there be a written agreement betweenthe hospital and the nonhospital entity that the resident will spend substantiallyall of his or her time in patient care activities, and that the resident'scompensation for the time spent in the outside entity is paid by the hospital.We would also like to clarify that, where a hospital has such an agreementwith a nonhospital entity, appropriate reductions are to be made to theSeptember 1 indirect medical education count of interns and residents inapproved programs to reflect the fact that some residents are assignedto settings outside the hospital. (See andSection; 412.118(h).) <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter requested clarification as to the treatmentof short cost reporting periods in the GME base period and in periods beginningon or after July 1, 1985. The commenter felt that counting a partial monthas a full month in the base period would understate the base period amountswhile the opposite would be true in the payment years. <T3>Response:</T3> We agree. Therefore, we are modifying andSection; 413.86(e)(4)(ii)to provide that daily averages are multiplied by the number of days ina year to achieve a more equitable base period average per resident amount.We are not modifying andSection; 413.86(e)(4)(iii) since that subclause doesnot discuss the adjustment in terms of monthly amounts, and it would onlybe reasonable to prorate a month as applicable for payment purposes forcost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter expressed concern about the inability toupdate the list of approved residencies and their initial residency periodsfrom the 1985 edition of the Directory of Residency Training Programs tothe 1989 edition of that book.<T3>Response: </T3>Section 1886(h)(5)(G)(ii) of the Act indicates thatwe must use periods necessary to satisfy the requirements for board eligibilityas specified in the 1985-1986 Directory of Residency Training Programs(the Directory) published by the ACGME. Section 1886(h)(5)(G)(iii) of theAct indicates that initial residency periods may be changed beginning July1, 1989 if the ACGME increases or decreases the minimum number of yearsfor board eligibility in its revised Directory. We intend to adopt a similarapproach to publications concerning approved programs in osteopathy, dentistry,and podiatry. However, the provision applies only to the number of yearsof training necessary to satisfy the requirements of a specialty and doesnot affect our ability to recognize additional types of programs. In thisregard, we applied initial residency periods to subspecialty programs ininternal medicine that were not listed in the 1985-1986 edition of theACGME Directory. <T3>Comment: </T3>A law firm representing the Society of Critical CareMedicine commented that fellowship programs in Critical Care Medicine shouldbe added to the listing of approved GME programs in Internal Medicine,Anesthesiology, Surgery, and Pediatrics. A letter from the AccreditationCouncil for Graduate Medical Education was submitted indicating that residencyprograms in Surgical Critical Care Medicine, Anesthesiology Critical CareMedicine, and Critical Care Medicine (Internal Medicine) will be approvedduring 1989, and that the approved programs would be listed in the Directoryof Graduate Medical Education Programs published in March 1990. <T3>Response: </T3>We are adding the three types of programs that havebeen approved to our listings, effective July l, 1989. The complete listof approved GME programs and the corresponding initial residency periodsis set forth in Table 2b of the appendix to this final rule. We shall awaitadditional information on the status of Pediatric Critical Care Medicineprograms. If such programs are approved at some later date, we will makethe appropriate changes in a notice we plan to publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> before July 1 of every year listing the limitson initial residency periods for the various specialty and subspecialtyprograms for the academic year beginning on July 1. <T3>Comment:</T3> The American Association of Dental School  notified usthat effective July 1989, oral and maxillofacial surgery residency programswill require an additional year of training. Similarly, the American Collegeof General Practitioners in Osteopathic Medicine and Surgery notified usthat on July 1, 1989, the length of training in osteopathic general practiceprogram will be increased by one year. <T3>Response: </T3>As discussed in the previous response, we plan to publisha notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> before July 1 of every year listing the limitson initial residency periods for the various specialty and subspecialtyprograms for the academic year beginning on July 1. We are making the changesreferred to in the comment in Table 2b of the appendix to this final rulewhich will serve as the notice applicable to July 1, 1989. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter pointed out that some residency programsrequire less than the 5-year limit for completion while others requiremore than 5 years. The commenter suggested that some latitude be givenin recognizing these variations. <T3>Response: </T3>We do not believe that the provisions of section 1886(h)of the Act permit these variations. While the conference report that accompaniedPub. L. 99-272 (H.R. Rep. No. 453, 99th Cong., 1st Sess. 481 (1985)) isnot explicit on why Congress set this limit, we must infer that Congressintended a reduced Medicare participation in longer programs. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters requested clarification of how theinitial residency period limit applies when a resident changes from onespecialty program to another. One commenter suggested that the first portionof GME training not be counted toward completion of an initial residencyperiod while another inquired whether training in both programs will becounted. It was pointed out that, under the proposed rule, the number ofyears of prior training becomes a factor in the selection process becauseof the payment implications.<T3>Response: </T3>An individual resident would have only one initial residencyperiod. Section 1886(h)(5)(F) of the Act requires that the initial residencyperiod be determined at the time the resident enters the residency program.We believe it was the intent of Congress that any time spent in an approvedGME program would be counted toward the overall limit, and that Congressprovided an additional year beyond that necessary to be eligible for boardcertification to address situations such as a change in specialty programs.It would not be necessary for a resident to complete a program to havethe years spent in that program counted. Thus, if a resident transferredfrom a 3-year program after the second year to a 5-year program, the initialresidency period of the 3-year program would set the limit. As a practicalmatter, this would have the effect of counting the resident as .5 ratherthan 1.0 for only 1 year more than if the 5-year program's limit was used.If it were the intent of Congress that a new initial residency period beginwhenever a resident changes programs or hospitals, there would have beenno need to use the adjective ``initial'', and the overall limit would bemeaningless. We would add that, if eligibility for Medicare payments becomesa criterion for the selection of residents by officials of residency programs,it is a further indication that Medicare has become the financier of GMEprograms to an inordinate degree. <T3>Comment: </T3>Representatives of the specialities of Internal Medicineand Family Practice requested clarification of the status of individualswho are spending a fourth year in a program such as General Internal Medicineand Family Practice that usually is a 3-year program. It was pointed outthat some programs have added a fourth year for a variety of reasons. Inother programs, individuals who have completed their requirements for boardcertification spend a fourth year as a chief resident and are technicallyno longer in a program leading to certification in a specialty or subspecialty.<T3>Response: </T3>If it is clear that these individuals are actually informally organized approved programs, we believe that they should be countedas residents in approved programs even if the individual has completedthe requirements for board certification. The situation is not unlike thosewe discussed in the proposed rule concerning Transitional Year programsand General Dentistry programs, neither of which, in itself, lead to certificationin a specialty or subspecialty. We do not believe that Congress enactedsection 1886(h) of the Act to reduce the types of programs recognized byMedicare. Thus, if the AGCME and other accrediting bodies recognize suchindividuals as residents in the General Internal Medicine or Family Practiceprogram, we would count them for purposes of direct GME payments at .5or 1.0 FTE depending on whether they are still in their initial residencyperiod. We would differentiate these individuals from those who have completedtheir residency but remain for an additional period of time within theacademic settings to continue their training outside the context of a formallyorganized approved program. Individuals in the latter group should be paidas physicians. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter cited situations in which residents whoplan research or academic careers take time off from the normal courseof their residency programs to pursue a year or two of research and laboratorywork. Since residents in these situations would not be counted for purposesof direct GME payments, the commenter believed that it should be clarifiedthat such years would not count against their initial residency periods.<T3>Response: </T3>We can envision situations in which GME training thatmay not be counted for direct GME payment purposes could, nevertheless,be counted against the initial residency period such as in the case ofan FMG who has not passed the FMGEMS. However, in the situation presented,it appears that such residents would not be in an approved GME programand, thus, should not be counted for either direct, or indirect, GME paymentpurposes.<T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter pointed out the different results thatcan occur when a medical school graduate enters a transition year programbefore selecting a specialty program and when another graduate enters ageneral internal medicine program and uses the latter program as an internshipyear prior to selecting another specialty program. In the former case,the resident's initial residency period is determined by the specialtyprogram selected after the transition year, while in the latter case, theresident's initial residency period is limited to the 4-year period assignedto internal medicine. The commenter believes that in the latter case, thegraduate has made himself or herself a less attractive candidate for thespecialty program they ultimately chose. <T3>Response:</T3> This is probably an unintended result of the legislation.It would be unfortunate if someone's career plans were negatively affectedin this way. However, section 1886(h)(5)(F) of the Act requires that theinitial residency periods shall be determined at the time the residententers the training program. We believe that this precludes starting anew initial residency period every time a resident changes a program. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter indicated that the concept of ``initialresidency period'' as proposed penalizes residents (and their hospitals)who change from one specialty program to another. These changes may takeplace for various reasons such as lack of adequate training or inappropriatecareer counselling. <T3>Response:</T3> We believe that, by the use of the word ``initial,''Congress intended the provision to be implemented as we proposed. Otherwise,there would be no need to use that term. We concede that there could beindividual residents who are negatively affected by this provision, butwe believe that we have no discretion in the application of the overallfive-year limit. <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters pointed out that counting residentsby their monthly assignments will be particularly difficult for past costreporting periods to which section 1886(h) of the Act would apply. Onesuggested that the indirect medical education count be used for the pastperiods and that the monthly count should be used prospectively. <T3>Response:</T3> We believe that hospitals or GME program directors shouldhave this information for the cost reporting periods in question. We alsobelieve that it would not be appropriate to use the indirect count forthose periods since it would not be possible to apply the weighting factorswithout specific information on the residents involved. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter believes that we acted prematurely in publishingthe proposal on counting graduates of foreign medical schools (FMGs) priorto Congressional action on the recommendations of the Council on GraduateMedical Education on FMGs. The commenter went on to indicate that it wasunfair to require FMGs to pass FMGEMS while not requiring graduates ofAmerican medical schools to pass the National Board of Medical Examiners'examination. <T3>Response:</T3> The proposed rule essentially restates the statutoryprovisions on counting procedures for FMGs (section 1886(h)(4) (C) and(D) of the Act), and we cannot ignore a provision of law enacted by Congresson the basis that the law might be changed in the future. Further, thestatute gives HCFA no discretion with respect to the implementation ofthis provision. We would like to point out that once an individual FMGpasses FMGEMS, he or she is treated by Medicare on the same basis as anyother resident in an approved GME program. <T3>Comment:</T3> In commenting on the proposed rule, a representativeof the Public Health Service pointed out that, beginning in September 1989,the Education Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG) will beoffering the National Board of Medical Examiners' Part I and Part II examinationto graduates of foreign medical schools (FMGs) as an alternative to theFMGEMS. <T3>Response:</T3> Section 1886(h)(4)(D) of the Act provides that, generally,to be counted for payment purposes beginning July 1, 1986, an FMG musthave passed FMGEMS or previously received certification from, or has previouslypassed the examination at, the ECFMG. Section 1886(h)(5)(E) of the Actprovides that, ``the term, `FMGEMS' examination, means parts I and II ofthe Foreign Medical Graduate Examination in the Medical Sciences recognizedby the Secretary for this purpose.'' It does not specify a particular sponsoringorganization for the examination. Since the ECFMG has recognized an alternateexamination and since the Secretary is willing to accept this change, webelieve that he is directly authorized to do so under section 1886(h)(5)(E)of the Act. Accordingly, we are adding a new subparagraph (h)(5) to andSection;413.86 to state that beginning September 1, 1989, passage of both partsof that examination may be substituted for passage of FMGEMS.<T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter asked why it was necessary for us to knowthe school the resident graduated from and the date of the graduation.<T3>Response:</T3> Section 1886(h)(4)(D) of the Act requires that we identifyresidents who are graduates of foreign medical schools and to ascertainwhether these residents qualify to be counted for payment purposes. Intermediariesneed to know the date of graduation from medical school in order to ensurethat all GME training time has been counted for purpose of determiningthe limit of an initial residency period.<T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that the exception to the 5-yearoverall limit on initial residency periods should be applied to other specialtiesin which there are shortages of physicians such as family practice, anesthesiology,and physical medicine.<T3>Response:</T3> We believe that the language of section 1886(h)(5)(F)(ii)of the Act makes it clear that Congress intended to exempt only geriatricprograms from the ceiling on initial residency periods.<T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that the regulations clearlystate that resident time studies, for purposes of allocation on WorksheetB-1, are no longer required. <T3>Response:</T3> We do not believe that it is necessary to include thistype of detail in the regulations; it would more properly be handled throughoperating instructions. To clarify the point, however, since reimbursementis not made on a reasonable cost basis, resident time studies would notbe required for payment purposes. However, any time residents are assignedoutside the hospital should be documented as set forth in andSection; 413.86(f).<T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that HCFA should take into considerationchanges that have taken place in GME training in ambulatory settings andapply the provision to count time spent in nonhospital training sites retroactivelyto the GME base period costs.<T3>Response:</T3> The provision on counting time spent in outpatient settingsin section 1886(h)(4)(E) of the Act that was added by section 9314 of PublicLaw 99-509 has an effective date of July 1, 1987, and a change in thatdate would compromise some of the savings contemplated by the enactmentof section 1886(h) of the Act. Further, HCFA changed its policy in the1970's to allow the services of licensed residents in nonprovider settingsto be covered as physicians' services payable on reasonable charge basiseven though the services were furnished within the scope of an approvedGME program. These billings would not be allowed where the provisions ofsection 1886(h)(4)(E) of the Act are applied. E. Determining Medicare Patient Load<T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter opposed the substitution of ``Medicarepatient load'' (based on inpatient days only) for the traditional approachof determining Medicare's share of GME costs and payments. The commenterbelieved that this approach is inconsistent with other Medicare policiesand regulations that encourage more procedures to be performed in outpatientsettings thereby reducing the Part A inpatient load.<T3>Response:</T3> Section 1886(h)(3)(A) of the Act specifies that theMedicare patient load is the basis to be used in determining Medicare'sshare of the GME payments. Section 1886(h)(3)(C) defines Medicare patientload as ``the fraction of the total number of inpatient-bed-days (as establishedby the Secretary) during the period which are attributable to patientswith respect to whom payments may be made under Part A.'' While this provisiongives the Secretary some flexibility in deciding which inpatient days areto be counted, it is clear that Congress intended that inpatient days areto be used for this purpose. We recognize that this provision will affectsome hospitals negatively while others will receive a higher payment thanwould otherwise be the case.<T3>Comment:</T3> Some commenters indicated that it was not clear whetherthe inpatient days of a subprovider, such as psychiatric or rehabilitationunits that are excluded from the prospective payment system, are countedin calculating the Medicare patient load in a health care complex. Onecommenter pointed out that it was inconsistent to count inpatient daysin excluded units while not counting inpatient days of hospital-based skillednursing facilities. The commenter indicated that excluded units are likelyto have lower Medicare utilization and not to be part of a hospital's GMEprogram. Another commenter expressed concern that our definition of ``Medicarepatient load'' could have a negative impact on a health care complex witha large skilled nursing facility.<T3>Response:</T3> We believe that the preamble discussion on this pointat 53 FR 36600 was clearer than the regulation text and we are modifyingthe definition of ``Medicare patient load'' in andSection; 413.86(b)(2).The Medicare inpatient days and total inpatient days of all componentsof a health care complex that are classified as part of the ``hospital''are added together to determine the Medicare patient load for the complex.Inpatient days of a hospital-based skilled nursing facility would not becounted in calculating the Medicare patient load since the facility isnot classified as part of the ``hospital''. We believe that this approachis consistent with the special method of determining Medicare utilizationestablished by Congress in section 1886(h)(3)(C) of the Act. It treatssimilarly situated hospitals consistently, regardless of their connections(if any) with skilled nursing facilities.<T3>Comment:</T3> Some commenters suggested that section 1886(h) of theAct should apply only to hospitals paid under the prospective payment system.One commenter believed that the policy on determining ``Medicare patientload'' that is based on all inpatient hospital days of a health care complexis inappropriate because residents are never assigned to the excluded psychiatricunits in some hospitals and counting the inpatient days of the unit wouldskew the GME payments.<T3>Response:</T3> There is nothing in the language of section 1886(h)of the Act or its accompanying conference report that indicates that itshould apply only to prospective payment hospitals. We believe that theCongress intended the revised payment method to apply to all hospitalsand hospital-based providers.<T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters requested clarification as to whethernursery room days (or newborn days) are counted when the ratio of inpatientbed days payable under Part A to total inpatient bed days is calculatedfor the purpose of determining the Medicare patient load.<T3>Response:</T3> It has been the standard practice to exclude nurseryroom days in all Medicare computations that involve inpatient days sincethe Medicare program does not incur any liabilities for nursery room costs.We believe that such days should also be excluded in the determinationof Medicare patient load for the purposes of this provision. Therefore,we are modifying the definition of ``Medicare patient load'' in andSection;413.86(b) to clarify this point. However, consistent with this treatmentof nursery room days, no GME costs that are allocated to the nursery roomcost center in the GME base period will be included in the GME base-periodper resident amount.<T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter opposed the application of section 1886(h)of the Act to the outpatient dialysis facilities of hospitals. It was pointedout that determining utilization under the Medicare patient load does nottake into consideration that the patient group affected in these outpatientdepartments is virtually 100 percent Medicare. <T3>Response:</T3> We believe that the substitution of GME payments basedon per-resident amounts under section 1886(h) of the Act for reasonablecost reimbursement in all components of hospitals is required by the statute.An integral part of the revised payment methodology is the use of inpatientstatistics alone to determine Medicare utilization for GME payments. Whilethe commenter has raised a valid point, we do not believe that section1886(h) of the Act gives us the authority to continue reimbursement forGME costs on a reasonable cost basis in these facilities. On the contrary,section 1886(h)(4)(E) of the Act specifically provides that all the timespent by a resident under an approved program must be counted without regardto the setting in which the activities are performed, if the hospital incursall, or substantially all, of the costs for the training program in thatsetting. <T3>Comment:</T3> Some commenters asked for clarification of whether thepart of the GME payment apportioned for Part B will be paid at 100 percentor 80 percent. <T3>Response:</T3> 100 percent of the Part B GME amount will be added toMedicare Part B allowable costs after excluding actual GME costs and aftersubtracting the 20 percent coinsurance amount charged to the beneficiaryunder the regular provisions applicable to hospital outpatient services.<T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters requested clarification as to the treatmentof Part B inpatient days in calculating the Medicare patient load for paymentpurposes. <T3>Response:</T3> The commenters have raised a point that was not discussedin the proposed rule and is a further example of the widespread effectsof section 1886(h) of the Act on many areas of Medicare payments to hospitals.In the early years of Medicare, it was decided administratively that oncea Medicare beneficiary's Part A benefits expire, it was appropriate tocount any remaining days of hospitalization as Part B inpatient days. Inthis way, a per diem payment could be developed for these beneficiariesto compensate teaching hospitals for GME costs under Part B even thoughno reimbursement was available under Part A. The GME payment made under section 1886(h) of the Act is a substitute forall reasonable cost reimbursement in hospitals and health care complexesfor the costs of approved GME programs under both Part A and Part B. Therefore,in settling cost reports for periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985,no reasonable cost payments will be made for GME costs attributable toPart B inpatient days. Also, these days would not be counted in calculatingthe Medicare patient load since section 1886(h)(3)(C) of the Act specifiesthat only inpatient days payable under Part A would be counted in makingthis calculation. We note that with the implementation of the MedicareCatastrophic Coverage Act (Pub. L. 100-360) on January 1, 1989, Part Binpatient days will no longer occur as a result of the expiration of PartA benefits. However, we do recognize there may be relatively few Medicareinpatients who do not have Part A coverage but do have Part B coverage.F. Apportionment Between Part A and Part B <T3>Comment:</T3> Some commenters asked whether GME payments apportionedto Part B in accordance with proposed andSection; 413.86(d)(3) are to besubjected to the lesser-of-costs-or-charges provision set forth in andSection;413.13 on the same basis as hospital outpatient costs.<T3>Response: </T3>The payment methodology established by section 1886(h)of the Act is a self-contained payment provision without reference to theusual Medicare payment provisions. It is a substitution for reasonablecost reimbursement of GME costs that had previously been made under section1861(v) of the Act. Payments are to be made under the provisions of section1886(h)(3) of the Act, which does not contain a lesser-of-costs-or-chargesprovision. Accordingly, we believe that it would be inappropriate to applythe lesser-of-costs-or-charges provision to payments that are not determinedon a reasonable cost basis since the outpatient component of the GME paymentsmade under section 1886(h) of the Act is to be made to the hospital regardlessof the costs actually incurred by the hospital. Therefore, effective withcost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985, the lesser-ofcosts-or charges comparison is made with no GME costs (or section 1886(h)payments) included in the cost element of the comparison. (The Medicarecost report will be modified to exclude actual GME cost in the comparison.)The effect of this policy position will vary depending on the circumstancesof individual hospitals, and it will be necessary to adjust retroactivelythe settlements that have been made with regard to some teaching hospitalseffective back to cost reporting periods beginning on or after July l,1985. Hospitals will be advantaged in situations in which a hospital'sallowable Part B costs were higher than its charges in past periods resultingin a reduction in Medicare reasonable cost reimbursement to the level Medicarecharges. These hospitals will receive GME payments for some or all of theircosts that were not reimbursable under the lesser-of-costs-or-charges provision.On the other hand, the hospitals that were exempted from lesser-of-costs-or-chargesprovision by section 2308(b)(1) of the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984 (Pub.L. 98-369) because their charges were considered ``nominal'' by virtueof being 60 percent or less of the reasonable costs of services or itemsrepresented by the charges could be disadvantaged by this policy. Thesehospitals could lose their exemption from the lesser-of-costs-or-chargesprovision if, in comparing costs to charges for purposes of the nominalitytest, GME costs are not included in reasonable costs. To avoid having unreimbursedcosts, these hospitals would need to reduce their charges in order to retaintheir nominal charge status or alternatively, forego their exemption andraise their charges. We do not believe it would be appropriate to implement a policy that wouldrequire these hospitals to either alter their charge structures or facereductions in reasonable cost payments. We recognize that hospitals taketheir full costs into account in establishing their charge structure andbelieve it is appropriate that they continue to do so without facing reductionin Medicare payments. Therefore, we are providing that, solely for thepurpose of applying the nominality test, reasonable costs will includeGME payments rather than GME costs. The use of GME payments, which aresubject to a special apportionment methodology, offers the simplicity ofavoiding the need to determine actual GME costs. In fact, the use of GMEpayments, if greater than actual GME costs, will provide an advantage tothe hospital by causing the nominality test to be met more easily. However,if the hospital believes that its actual costs are greater than the GMEpayments, it may use its actual GME costs in applying the nominality testif it can demonstrate to the intermediary that its actual reasonable costsare greater. If the intermediary can be assured that the hospital's actualreasonable GME costs applicable to Medicare patients covered under PartB are greater, such costs will be used in lieu of the Medicare Part B GMEpayments in the nominality test. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter argued that the proposed method of apportioningGME payments between Part A and Part B would be arbitrary and incorrectand should only be used if the hospital cannot provide specified documentationof GME costs. It was also pointed out that the hospital cannot recoverthe applicable Part B deductible and coinsurance amounts under this methodology.<T3>Response: </T3>First, we note that the revised payment methodologyresults in GME payments that are not based on a hospital's actual costsincurred for GME programs. Under this provision, a teaching hospital couldreceive more or less than it actually incurs for the programs. Thus, webelieve that it cannot be maintained that Congress intended that the GMEpayments reflect actual current GME costs. Second, the apportionment processdoes not affect the total direct GME payments to be made. Rather, it isused to determine the respective trust funds from which payments are tomade. Finally, with regard to the point on Medicare beneficiary copayments,these payments are made by beneficiaries based on a hospital's Part B charges,not costs. The proposed apportionment method would have no effect on thisaspect of the Medicare program. G. Other Comments <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters suggested that an exceptions processbe established to take into consideration changes that take place in ahospital's GME program after the base period. Among the many examples givenof changes that might take place were modifications of salary arrangementsregarding the residents, the need to pay higher salaries to fill certainresidency slots, and new arrangements involving space costs allocated toGME activities. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that Congress intended to establish a paymentmethod that has a historical basis in the GME costs of individual hospitalsduring the base period, but which is not based on actual costs incurredfor GME programs in any year thereafter. Thus, section 1886(h) of the Actdoes not provide for an exceptions procedure that would raise or lowerper resident amounts based on some new circumstance of the program. Theonly exception provided by Congress applied to hospitals that did not havea GME program during the base period or that were not participating inMedicare during that period. We can only infer that had Congress intendedthat a more general exceptions process exist, it would have provided forthis in provisions of the law or in the conference report. Further, itcould be argued that if it were intended that the per resident amountsreflect actual costs, there would have been little point in changing thepayment method already in effect in 1986. Congress could have simply retainedreasonable cost reimbursement with some limiting factor on the rate-of-increasein the costs of these programs. However, Congress provided instead for a hospital-specific payment thatmay be characterized as similar to the hospital-specific rate used in theprospective payment system. As such, the payment method is neutral withregards to hospital-specific costs. For example, a hospital could changeits arrangements with its teaching physicians in such a way that the physiciansare no longer receiving a salary for their services associated with theGME programs. These hospitals could conceivably make a profit on theirGME programs since they would continue to receive per resident amountsbased on costs they no longer incur. We believe that it was the intentof Congress not to take these sorts of program changes into account but,rather, to leave it to the hospitals to adjust for such changes in viewof the amount of payment they are receiving. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter pointed out that the provisions of theproposed andSection; 405.521(d)(3) allow for an adjustment to be made forsituations in which a teaching hospital may elect to be reimbursed on areasonable cost basis for direct medical and surgical services furnishedto individual patients, in lieu of reasonable charge payments that mightotherwise be payable for such services, for the first time in a cost reportingperiod beginning on or after the effective date of section 1886(h) of theAct. The proposed rule accommodated this election (which is made underthe authority of section 1861(b)(7) of the Act) by providing for the removalof physician compensation costs related to the supervision of interns andresidents in approved programs in the care of individual patients fromthe GME base-period costs to prevent duplicate payments. The commentersuggested that a similar accommodation should be provided for the oppositesituation in which a hospital withdraws the election in a cost reportingperiod beginning on or after the effective date of section 1886(h) of theAct. This would involve augmenting the GME base-period costs by costs incurredfor the supervision of interns and residents in the care of individualpatients. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 1886(h) of the Act does not address the specialpayment provision of section 1861(b)(7) of the Act, that is, the cost electionfor reimbursement of physicians' direct medical and surgical services inteaching hospitals. In our proposed andSection; 405.521(d)(3), we providedfor the special circumstance of teaching hospitals making the cost electionboth because it was still an effective payment provision and because webelieved that it was possible to make the necessary adjustment to the GMEbase-period costs. However, we do not believe that it would be possibleto make the necessary adjustment to the GME base period in the situationof a hospital that withdraws the cost election after the effective dateof section 1886(h) of the Act. The term ``direct medical and surgical services'' was established in andSection;405.465 (which implements part of section 1861(b)(7) of the Act) and encompassesthe following types of activities engaged in by physicians in teachinghospitals: andbullet; Services in which teaching physicians exercise an overall supervisoryrole over the cases in which residents treat patients. andbullet; Services in which teaching physicians are more actively involvedin the care furnished to individual patients by residents to the extentthat a fee would be payable in the absence of the cost election (that is,there is an attending physician relationship). andbullet; Services personally furnished by the physicians without involvementof residents. One of the major features of section 1861(b)(7) of the Act, originallyenacted as part of section 227 of Public Law 92-603, was the administrativesimplicity that resulted from relieving teaching hospitals, intermediaries,and carriers from having to distinguish which of the three circumstancesapplied in individual cases. Costs representing all three types of caseswould be included without separate identity in the amounts paid under thecost election while only the costs that fall into the first category wouldbe appropriately included in the GME cost category. Since the differenttypes of costs are not separately identified, we do not believe it wouldbe possible to adjust GME base-period costs if the cost election were withdrawn.One of the reasons a teaching hospital would want to drop the cost electionfor physicians' direct medical and surgical services would be to institutefee-for-service billing for physician services furnished to Medicare patients.This would apply both to services personally performed by the physicianand those which he or she furnishes within the context of an attendingphysician relationship. The only classification of costs for which a teachinghospital would not be paid would be the less intensive role of supervisingresidents in the care of individual patients where no attending physicianrelationship is established. Other physician compensation costs associatedwith the GME program would not have been reimbursable through the costelection mechanism but as direct GME costs during the GME base period.The teaching hospital could address any shortfall from not recognizingthe supervisory services of teaching physicians in the care of individualpatients by upgrading the physicians' involvement to that of an attendingphysician role. The supervisory role of the physician would then be recognizedthrough reasonable charge billing under Medicare Part B, and we believethat this would have been the whole purpose of changing to a fee-for-servicesituation. Hence, we believe that, in the situation described by the commenter,there is an available mechanism (that is, Part B reasonable charge billing)to address the change. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter indicated that the payment policy in theproposed rule seems to favor GME programs that are fairly stable and failsto take into account rapid changes that are taking place in GME training.<T3>Response: </T3>We have inferred from the revised payment method establishedby section 1886(h) of the Act that, for Medicare payment purposes, Congressintended to freeze direct GME financial arrangements as they existed duringthe base period subject to an update factor for inflation and recognitionof changes in the number of residents in approved programs. It has theeffect of tying Medicare payments to the financial arrangements that existedin the base year, regardless of any future changes in such arrangements.However, the subsequent enactment of section 1886(h)(4)(E) of the Act bysection 9314 of Public Law 99-509 does provide for at least one exceptionin that training in settings other than Medicare providers would be recognizedfor payment purposes. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that hospitals in New York Statebe allowed to use their first year under the prospective payment system(that is, cost reporting periods beginning on or after January l, 1986)as the GME base period rather than the generally applicable FY 1984 costreporting period. <T3>Response: </T3>The statute requires that per resident amounts be basedon hospital cost reporting periods that began during FY 1984. We have noauthority to revise that base period. We note that the revised GME paymentmethodology applies to both hospitals subject to and excluded from theprospective payment system. Therefore, there would seem to be no reasonfor using a different base period for a hospital simply because the Statechose to apply for a waiver from the prospective payment system. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter believed that the proposed policy concerningthe determination of per resident amounts for hospitals that did not participateor have an approved medical residency training program during base periodwas unclear as to whether it applied to any new programs in a hospitalwith existing programs, or only to a hospital that starts its first GMEprogram after the base period. This policy was proposed in andSection; 413.86(e)(5)and is now located in andSection; 413.86(e)(4). <T3>Response: </T3>This policy applies only to hospitals that either werenot participating in Medicare during the base period or that had no approvedGME program during the base period. The provisions of section 1886(h) ofthe Act provides for additional new programs in teaching hospitals withexisting programs by recognizing changes in the number of residents inapproved programs. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter representing a hospital that began itsfirst GME program after its cost reporting period beginning in FY 1984believes that the costs incurred for the first program year are not representativeof the actual yearly costs of its program since it became fully operational.The commenter pointed out that the hospital incurred program costs priorto the entrance of residents into the program, that residents' salarieswould be understated in the initial years because of the absence of seniorresidents from the program, that faculty physicians and plant facilitiescame into use at various times, and that start-up costs were inherentlydifferent from ongoing program costs. The commenter suggested that perresident amounts of other teaching hospitals be used as a floor ratherthan a ceiling in calculating a base period amount for new programs. Anothercommenter recommended that new programs be given a three-year exemptionfrom the revised GME payment methodology, and be paid during those yearson the basis of reasonable costs. The third year of operation would thenbecome the base year for determining the per resident amount for all futureperiods. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that the commenters have raised some veryvalid points about new GME programs in that all elements of the programdo not fall into place at the same time. Further, we believe that the applicableprovision of section 1886(h) of the Act did not envision a situation inwhich a hospital's GME program began on July 1 of a given year, while thehospital's cost reporting period began on some other date, such as October1 or January 1. In such a situation, the first year of the program wouldnot be reflective of the costs of the program since residents might beon duty and receiving a salary during as few as one or two months of thecost reporting period. Further, a strict application of the law would precludeany recognition of start-up costs incurred in a cost reporting period beforethe arrival of residents since the counting of residents in the programis the payment vehicle for GME costs. On the other hand, ongoing GME programsoften undergo changes with additions and reductions of staff and facilities.There will be many situations in which a hospital's GME payments underthe provisions of section 1886(h) of the Act may fall short of a hospital'sactual GME costs during a particular cost reporting period. We believethat it is implicit in the revised payment method that Congress intendedthat no special adjustments be made if this should happen.However, we believe that instances in which a hospital begins a GME programfor the first time after the GME base period will be rare, and we wishto reach a reasonable accommodation as to the per resident amounts payableto these hospitals. Accordingly, we are modifying andSection; 413.86(e)(4)(proposed andSection; 413.86(c)(5)) to provide that the base period for determiningper resident amounts in hospitals that begin a GME program after the baseperiod will be the first cost reporting period in which residents wereon duty in their GME program during the first month of the cost reportingperiod. Any GME costs incurred for the prior cost reporting period willbe made on a reasonable cost basis under section 1861(v) of the Act aswas the case for cost reporting periods beginning prior to July 1, 1985.We agree that basing payments on an unrepresentative base period couldhave an adverse effect on a hospital; however, we are also bound by thestatutory language of section 1886(h)(2)(E) of the Act, which deals withhospitals that start a GME program only after 1984. We believe that themodifications we are making in andSection; 413.86(e)(4) of the proposed rulerepresent a reasonable compromise between these two conflicting objectivesbut are also consistent with the statutory language. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Summary of Changes from the Proposed Rule </ITAG>For the convenience of the reader, we are briefly summarizing the majorchanges we have made in this document.andbullet; We have revised andSection; 413.13 to specify the treatment of GMEcosts and payments under the lesser of costs-or-charges provision. andbullet; We have modified the definition of ``Medicare patient load'' inandSection; 413.86(b)(2) to be the total number of Medicare hospital inpatientdays during the cost reporting period divided by total hospital inpatientdays. In calculating inpatient hospital days, nursery days are excludedand only hospital distinct part days are included. andbullet; We have revised andSection; 413.86(e)(1) to specify that the intermediarywill use a count of FTE residents for the GME base period that is reflectiveof the average number of FTE residents working in the health care complexduring the GME base period. andbullet; We have also revised andSection; 413.86(e)(1) to clarify that allresidents reported for all providers of the health care complex will becounted in calculating base-period amounts and that a hospital may appealthe intermediary's determination of the hospital's base-period averageper resident amount within 180 days from the date of the intermediary'snotice. andbullet; We have also revised andSection; 413.86(e)(1) to clarify that costsallocated to the nursery and to research and other nonreimbursable costcenters are excluded in determining GME base period costs. andbullet; We have added andSection; 413.86(e)(1)(iii) to clarify that if thehospital's cost report for its GME base period is no longer subject toreopening under andSection; 405.1885, the intermediary may modify the hospital'sbase period costs solely for purposes of computing the per resident amount.andbullet; We have revised andSection; 413.86(e)(4) (proposed andSection; 413.86(c)(5))to provide that the base period for determining per resident amounts inhospitals that begin a GME program after the base period will be the firstcost reporting period in which residents were on duty in their GME programduring the first month of the cost reporting period. andbullet; We have modified andSection; 413.86(e)(4)(ii) to provide that dailyaverages are multiplied by the number of days in a year to achieve a moreequitable base-period average per resident amount. andbullet; We have moved to andSection; 413.86(e)(5) the policy proposed inparagraph (e)(4) regarding the determination of per resident amounts forhospitals that did not participate or have an approved medical residencytraining program during the base period. andbullet; We have modified andSection; 413.86(f) so as to include in the FTEcount residents who are working in a Medicare hospital even if the residents'salaries are fully paid by other entities, either Federal or nonFederal.This revised counting policy will apply to both the GME base period andcost reporting periods subject to the new payment methodology. We havealso revised andSection; 413.86(f) to specify how part-time interns and internson rotation will be counted. andbullet; We have added a new subparagraph (h)(4) to andSection; 413.86 tostate that, beginning on September 1, 1989, passage of both parts of theNational Board of Medical Examiners Examination may be substituted forpassage of FMGEMS. andbullet; We have moved to andSection; 413.86(f)(1)(iii) the policy proposedin andSection; 413.86(g)(4), effective July 1, 1987, concerning the timespent in nonprovider settings. andbullet; We clarify in new andSection; 413.86(j) that hospitals that areexcluded from the prospective payment system may request to have theirtarget amount recomputed to reflect misclassified costs in the same wayprospective payment hospitals may request to have their HSRs recomputed.We also clarify that the adjustment to the HSR is effective for the hospital'scost reporting periods that are still subject to reopening under andSection;405.1885. <ITAG tagnum="84">V. Regulatory Impact Analysis </ITAG>A. Introduction Executive Order 12291 (E.O. 12291) requires us to prepare and publish aregulatory impact analysis for any rule that meets one of the E.O. criteriafor a ``major rule''; that is, a rule that will be likely to result in_andbullet; An annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more; andbullet; A major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individualindustries, Federal, State, or local government agencies, or geographicregions; or andbullet; Significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or on the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.In addition, we generally prepare a final regulatory flexibility analysisthat is consistent with the Regulatory Flexibility Act (RFA) (5 U.S.C.601 through 612), unless the Secretary certifies that a final regulationwill not have a significant economic impact on a substantial number ofsmall entities. For purposes of the RFA, we treat all hospitals as smallentities. Also, section 1102(b) of the Social Security Act requires theSecretary to prepare a final regulatory impact analysis for any final rulethat may have a significant impact on the operations of a substantial numberof small rural hospitals. Such an analysis must conform to the provisionsof section 604 of the RFA. For purposes of section 1102(b) of the Act,we define a small rural hospital as a hospital with fewer than 50 bedslocated outside of a Metropolitan Statistical Area. The following discussion, in combination with the rest of this final rule,constitutes a combined regulatory impact analysis and regulatory flexibilityanalysis. However, because there are so few small rural hospitals withapproved GME programs, we have determined, and the Secretary certifiesthat this final rule will not have a significant impact on the operationsof a substantial number of small rural hospitals. B. Affected Entities We estimate that approximately 1,170 acute care hospitals in the 50 Statesand in Puerto Rico have approved programs for which they are receivingMedicare payment for GME costs. In 1987, there were approximately 81,000interns and residents enrolled in approved programs. The following table shows the distribution by census division of short-termacute care hospitals with approved GME programs, residents enrolled inGME programs and GME programs approved as of September l, 1987.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,i1,s25,4.2,6,8 </C><T4>Table I_Percent of Acute Care Hospitals With Approved GME Programsin FY </T4>1987, <T4>Residents on Duty on September </T4>1, 1987, <T4>and Approved GME Programs by Census Division </T4><H1> </H1><H1>Teaching hospitals </H1><H1>Residents \1\ </H1><H1>Approved  programs \1\</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">New England <D>6.7 </D><D>7.4 </D><D>8.0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Middle Atlantic <D>22.1 </D><D>23.8 </D><D>23.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> South Atlantic <D>12.4 </D><D>15.2 </D><D>15.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">East North Central <D>21.7 </D><D>17.3 </D><D>17.0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">East South Central <D>5.1 </D><D>4.3 </D><D>4.6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">West North Central <D>8.3 </D><D>6.8 </D><D>6.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">West South Central <D>8.0 </D><D>8.8 </D><D>8.9 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mountain <D>3.6 </D><D>3.1 </D><D>3.4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pacific <D>11.0 </D><D>12.2 </D><D>12.0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Puerto Rico <D>1.2 </D><D>1.1 </D><D>1.1</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>\2\ 100.1 </D><D>100.0 </D><D>100.0 </D><F>\1\ Source: 1988-1989 Directory of Graduate Medical Education Programs;Accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education.Reproduced with permission of the copyright holder, the American MedicalAssociation. </F><F>\2\ Total does not add to 100 percent due to rounding.</F></ITAG></ITAG> Table I shows that the distributions of teaching hospitals, residents,and approved GME programs parallel each other fairly closely. The MiddleAtlantic division has the greatest number of teaching hospitals, residents,and GME programs while the Mountain census division has the smallest numberof teaching hospitals, residents, and programs. It should be noted that while Table I presents only general acute carehospitals (primarily those hospitals under the prospective payment system),these regulations will apply to all participating Medicare hospitals andhealth care complexes having residents. These include long-term care hospitals,children's hospitals, psychiatric facilities, and rehabilitation hospitals.C. Savings These final regulations will implement the statutory requirement to controlthe growth in payments to hospitals with currently approved GME programsby limiting payment increases for direct GME costs to increases in theCPI-U, rather than paying these costs on the basis of the hospital's allowablereasonable costs. We also expect to achieve some small savings by reducingthe per resident amount paid for residents not in an initial residencyperiod. The following table presents the estimated savings expected tobe achieved from implementing this final rule, relative to what we estimatewould have been paid for the direct cost of GME under Medicare reasonablecost principles. The statutory provision requiring this regulation effectivelynegated the July 5, 1985, regulation that placed cost limits on GME paymentsand which would have resulted in greater savings than those shown below.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,i1,xl8,xl8,xl8,xl8,xl8 </C><T4>Table II_Medicare Program Savings * </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[In millions] </ITAG><H1>FY 1990 </H1><H1>FY 1991 </H1><H1>FY 1992 </H1><H1>FY 1993 </H1><H1>FY 1994</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">$500 <D>$430 </D><D>$370 </D><D>$470 </D><D>$580 </D><F>* Rounded to the nearest $10 million.</F></ITAG></ITAG> Since this final rule is effective retroactively from July 1, 1985, wewill be making adjustments to hospital GME payments made between July 1,1985, and the date this final rule is published. These adjustments reflectdifferences in payments made under the previous payment rules formerlylocated at andSection; 413.85 and this final rule. The savings shown in TableII, above, include retroactive annual savings of $290 million we expectto recoup in FY 1990 and $150 million in FY 1991. (In the proposed rule,we had assumed that the retroactive savings would be recouped in FYs 1989-1991.)In Table III, we present these same retroactive savings displayed by fiscalyear (FY 1985 to the present) in which these amounts were generated. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table III</T4>_<T4>Estimated Retroactive Medicare Program Savings by Fiscal Year in whichThey Were Generated* </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[In millions] </ITAG><H1>FY 1985 </H1><H1>FY 1986 </H1><H1>FY 1987 </H1><H1>FY 1988 </H1><H1>FY 1989</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">$10 <D>$30 </D><D>$120 </D><D>$120 </D><D>$160 </D><F>*Rounded to the nearest $10 million.</F></ITAG></ITAG> These savings estimates were computed using the method of apportioningGME costs prescribed by section 1886(h)(3) of the Act. That is, we comparedthe GME payments made under the previous payment method with those thatwill be made under the new payment method using inpatient days as the basisof apportioning GME costs between Medicare and non-Medicare payment sources.This approach to computing the savings estimates differs from the way wecomputed savings in the initial impact analysis. In the initial analysis,we computed savings based on the method of apportioning GME costs prescribedby the Provider Reimbursement Manual (HCFA Pub. 15_Part II). Under theseprocedures, only routine service and special care costs are apportionedon the basis of inpatient days. Ancillary and outpatient costs are apportionedon the basis of charges. Had we computed savings using the cost reportmethod of apportioning GME costs to Medicare, we would have overstatedsavings for the next five fiscal years by about $440 million.Although this rule implements provisions to substantially reduce Medicarepayments for GME, it is difficult to predict the effects these reductionswill have on specific GME programs. We know that patient revenues generallycomprise the major portion of GME funding, but the proportion of fundingvaries depending on a hospital's affiliation and the speciality programsthe hospital operates. State-run hospitals, for example, depend less onpatient revenues than do unaffiliated or church-affiliated hospitals. Also,oncology GME programs tend to receive more funding from sources other thanpatient revenues (that is, from grants and gifts) than GME programs infamily practice medicine. A critical factor in determining the impact of these regulations is theproportion of Medicare revenues a hospital received in its base period.The lower the proportion of Medicare revenues received in the base period,the smaller will be the impact of the new payment rules on the hospital'sfunding of its GME programs. Conversely, the greater the proportion ofMedicare revenues received in its base period, the greater will be theeffect of the new payment rules. D. Alternatives Considered Prior to the enactment of section 9202 of Public Law 99-272, we had consideredseveral alternatives that were based on the July 5, 1985 final rule establishinga ceiling on payment for all direct medical education expenses. The alternativeswould have maintained the ceiling for either 1 or 2 more years and thenpermitted the payment amount to increase by the CPI-U. Also, we consideredeliminating all payment for nursing and allied health professional educationprograms. Section 1886(h) of the Act enacted by section 9202 of PublicLaw 99-272 precluded further consideration of these alternatives. Under E.O. 12291 and the RFA we are also required to consider the consequencesof not taking the action. The consequence of not issuing the final rulewill be the failure to implement duly enacted legislation. The changesto provide payments based on the number of residents employed full-timein initial residency programs are mandated by statute. E. Discussion of Public Comments In response to the impact analysis in the proposed rule we received twotimely items of correspondence. The comments and our responses to themare set forth below. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter indicated that the preamble to the proposedrule should have discussed in greater detail the impact of the 5-year limitationon Medicare payments for residency programs of longer duration. The commenteralso believes that it will be more difficult for teaching hospitals toobtain alternative funding to replace reduced Medicare participation thanis indicated in the Regulatory Impact Analysis. <T3>Response: </T3>We should first point out that the payment methodologyset forth in section 1886(h) of the Act does not end payments for residentsin approved programs after their fifth residency year but merely reducesthe payments due to the reduction in the weighting factors for residentswho are not in their initial residency periods. Further, we believe thatit would be difficult to argue that the Medicare program, with its multipletypes of payments in response to various aspects of GME, has not been receptiveto financing of GME programs. We believe that the enactment of section1886(h) of the Act was a clear statement from Congress that a limitationon the growth in Medicare GME expenditures was necessary. Further, althoughnot explicitly stated, it reflects a decision on the part of Congress tofocus reductions on subspecialty programs beyond the initial residencyperiod rather than on primary care programs. We believe that a more appropriate organization to assess in greater detailthe impact of this change is the Council on Graduate Medical Educationestablished by Congress to make recommendations on various aspects of GMEtraining. HCFA does not possess the expertise to assess the long-term impactof its financing mechanisms on the training of physicians. Our role isto administer the Medicare program under the laws as passed by Congress.<T3>Comment: </T3>A State hospital association suggested that it wouldbe helpful if all proposed rules contain a financial impact by State inorder that an appropriate analysis could be assessed. <T3>Response: </T3>We have not adopted the commenter's suggestion for tworeasons. First, the data available to us, in many instances, are eitherincomplete or inaccurate. At a regional (census division) or national levelof aggregation, the effects of these deficiencies are diminished becauseerrors have a greater probability of being distributed normally throughoutthe data. Thus, errors in the data will tend to cancel each other out inthe aggregate. Also errors in a large sample will have less of an impact on statisticsdrawn from that sample than would errors in a small sample because of thesmaller weight each value has in the large sample. Thus, erroneous or missingvalues will have less of an effect on a large sample than they would ona small sample. It then also  follows that any conclusions drawn from asmall data set have a higher probability of being wrong than do conclusionsdrawn from a large data set. The second reason for not constructing an impact analysis by State hasto do with policy consideration.  To develop an impact analysis for eachState, we believe,  would be inconsistent with the national character ofthe Medicare program. In contrast to the Medicaid program (which is underthe administrative control of each State Medicaid agency), the Medicareprogram is under direct control of the Federal government, and therefore,the concerns and goals of the Medicare program are national in scope. Nevertheless,when our data permit a reasonably accurate analysis, we have presentedimpacts of proposed and final rules by census division and by locationsin urban or rural areas. Yet, because of the data limitations and the nationalcharacter of the Medicare program, we believe that formulating an analysisfor each State is inappropriate. F. Conclusion This rule is expected to significantly reduce payments to hospitals fortheir GME programs, principally through controlling the rate at which thesepayments increase. It is difficult, however, to predict which hospitalswill be significantly affected and how hospitals will respond to this rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Circumstances Require Retroactive Application of this Final Rule</ITAG>Pursuant to Congress's mandate in section 9202(b) of the Consolidated OmnibusBudget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (Pub. L. No. 99-272), this regulationis effective for cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985.We believe that we are required by law to apply this rule retroactivelyto all cost reports for cost reporting periods beginning on or after theeffective date prescribed by Congress. A. Congress Has Required Retroactive Application of this Rule The language of the statute unambiguously requires the retroactive applicationof this regulation. The statute expressly requires that the new paymentmethod for direct medical education costs be applied ``to hospital costreporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985.'' Moreover, the statutorylanguage expressly provides for a ``<T3>Substitution</T3> of Special Payment Rules,'' substituting a new paymentmethod for the method already in place, a method that was to be applicablefor cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985. Section9202(a) of Public Law 99-272 <T3>enacting </T3>section 1886(h)(1) of the Act (emphasis added). In addition,the description of the new payment method set forth at 9202(a) of PublicLaw 99-272 is replete with Congressional references to July 1, 1985 asthe date upon which the Secretary is to begin applying that new method.<T3>See </T3>andSection; 9202(a) of Public Law 99-272 <T3>enacting </T3>sections 1886 (h)(2), (h)(2)(C) and (h)(3)(A) of theAct; <T3>see also </T3>section 9202(i) of Public Law 99-272 <T3>amending </T3>section 1861(v)(1)(A) of the Act. This straightforward statutory language is, moreover, simply a manifestationof Congress's clear intent that this implementing regulation be appliedretroactively. That intent is demonstrated by the fact that Congress'senactment of the new payment regime for direct medical education costsitself had a retroactive effect. The new payment method was enacted onApril 1, 1986, over nine months after the beginning of the cost reportingperiod to which it was first applicable. In addition, with the enactmentof this new method, Congress deliberately foreclosed the possibility ofmaking payment for direct medical education costs under the payment methodologypreviously in effect for cost periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985.That method was based on a final rule, promulgated by the agency on July5, 1985, that placed a one year limit on medical education costs for costreporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985 but before July 1,1986. With the passage of section 9202 of Public Law 99-272, Congress nullifiedthe payment method embodied in the agency's 1985 regulation (section 9202(i)of Public Law 99-272) and replaced it with a detailed payment method ofits own devising. The legislative history accompanying section 9202 of Public Law 99-272makes it clear that Congress intended to repeal the previous system ofdirect medical education cost payment beginning on July 1, 1985. The ConferenceReport states that the ``methodology [prescribed in section 9202(a) ofPub. L. 99-272] replaces the current reasonable cost methodology for determininghospitals allowable costs, in calculating hospitals' medicare paymentsfor graduate medical education activities.'' See H.R. Rep. No. 453, 99thCong., 1st Sess. 484 (1985). Thus, for cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985, HCFAhas no authority to make final payment to providers under the previousmethod; HCFA is only authorized to make payment for direct medical educationcosts on the basis of the method prescribed by Congress in section 9202of Pub. L. 99-272. In repealing the regulation that previously governedmedical education payment for cost reporting periods beginning on or afterJuly 1, 1985, Congress must have intended its new method to apply to thatperiod instead. Consequently, in order to give effect to the intent ofCongress, the agency must apply this regulation retroactively. Given theexpress language of the statute, the fact that the statute itself has retroactiveeffect and the lack of legal authority to settle cost reports beginningon or after July 1, 1985 on the basis of the old payment method, it isclear that Congress intended that this regulation be applied retroactively.B. Retroactive Application of This Rule Is Consistent With the SupremeCourt's Decision in Bowen v. <T3>Georgetown University Hospital </T3>We believe that retroactive application of this regulation is not onlymandated by Congress but that it is also consistent with <T3>Bowen </T3>v. <T3>Georgetown University Hospital, </T3>109 S. Ct. 468 (1988) (``<T3>Georgetown</T3>''), the recent Supreme Court decision on retroactiverulemaking. <T3>Georgetown</T3> involved a retroactive application of a cost limitsregulation that the agency contended was authorized by section 1861(v)(1)(A)(ii)of the Act, permitting ``retroactive corrective adjustments'' to Medicarecost reports. However, the Supreme Court held that an agency may not applya regulation retroactively without the authorization of Congress, <T3>Georgetown</T3>, 109 S. Ct. at 471, and that the Medicare Act's correctiveadjustment provision did not authorize the retroactive application of thecost limits rule. Thus, the <T3>Georgetown</T3> decision holds that there must be some sort of Congressionalauthorization for the promulgation of retroactive rules. However, <T3>Georgetown</T3> does not require an express grant of Congressionalauthority in each case in which an agency seeks to apply a regulation retroactively.Rather, such an express grant is only required as an aid in construinga general grant of rulemaking authority such as section 1861(v)(1)(A) ofthe Act or the Administrative Procedure Act. Where other Congressionalenactments (such as section 9202 of Public Law 99-272) are relied uponas authority for retroactive application, it need only be shown that the``language requires'' retroactive application. Such language need not containan express authorization. Rather, the authorization may be implicit; itmay be evident only upon reading the language of the statute in light ofthe circumstances surrounding the enactment of that language. <T3>See, for example, Georgetown</T3>, 109 S. Ct. at 479-80. Nevertheless,even if <T3>Georgetown</T3> were to be read as requiring express authority at alltimes, it is clear that section 9202 of Public Law 99-272 provides suchexpress authority. The <T3>Georgetown</T3> court also held that congressional enactments otherthan general grants of rulemaking authority will be construed to authorizeretroactive application where their ``language requires this result.''Here the agency is not relying on our general grant of rulemaking authorityto support retroactive application, but, rather, on a specific congressionalenactment, that is, section 9202 of Public Law 99-272. As demonstratedabove, the plain language of section 9202 of Public Law 99-272, the factthat section 9202 of Public Law 99-272 itself has retroactive effect andthe repeal of the previous payment rule all require the retroactive applicationof this regime. Accordingly, it is clear that retroactive application ofthis regulation is supported by the Supreme Court's ruling in <T3>Georgetown</T3>. The concurring opinion in <T3>Georgetown</T3> explains in more detail the circumstances under whichretroactive application of an informal rule is permitted and, in doingso, provides even stronger support for retroactive application of thismedical education regulation. In his concurrence, Justice Scalia notesthat ``a particular statute may in some circumstances implicitly authorizeretroactive rulemaking.'' He explains that ``if a statute prescribes adeadline by which particular rules must be in effect, and if the agencymisses the deadline, the statute may be interpreted to authorize a reasonableretroactive rule * * *.'' Justice Scalia's example is analogous to thesituation here in which Congress has prescribed a specific effective datefor the operation of the new payment system and that date has passed beforethe promulgation of the implementing regulation. Indeed, that date passedbefore the enactment of the statute. Clearly, under Justice Scalia's analysis,Congress must be deemed to have at least implicitly authorized retroactiveapplication of this medical education regulation. In any event, the retroactiveapplication of this medical education regulation is plainly supported bythe majority opinion in <T3>Georgetown</T3>. C. Equitable Considerations Also Support the Retroactive Application ofThis Rule Retroactive application of this rule is not only supported by <T3>Georgetown</T3> but by several equitable considerations as well. Section9202 of Public Law 99-272 explicitly states that the new payment methodis effective for cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985.Since enactment of section 9202 of Public Law 99-272, all of HCFA's actionsrespecting direct medical education costs have been consistent with itsstated intention to apply the new payment method beginning on the effectivedate of the new statute. For example, on May 6, 1986 (at 51 FR 16776),HCFA announced that it planned to publish regulations implementing section9202 of Public Law 99-272 that would be designed to replace the old paymentmethod for medical education costs for cost reporting periods beginningon or after July 1, 1985. During this period, and the fiscal intermediarieshave informed providers that the new payment method would be applied tothose costs. In addition, because this regulation is largely self-implementing and theSecretary has had little discretion in crafting it, it contains few, ifany, innovations or deviations from the Congressionally-prescribed schemethat could come as a surprise to providers. Therefore, affected providershave known since at least the date of the enactment of Public Law 99-272of the details of the new payment method and of the fact that this newmethod would be applied retroactively. Finally, failure to apply this regulation retroactively will result notonly in a failure to effect Congress's intent but will also result in awindfall to the affected providers. To the extent that they have receivedgreater interim payments based on the old payment method than they willreceive under the new payment method, providers have, in effect, receivedan interest-free advance of Medicare funds that Congress clearly intendedthem not to retain. It would be egregiously inequitable to permit providersto reap this windfall, estimated to be $570 million, especially since theyhave been on notice that they would not be entitled to retain these funds.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Other Required Information </ITAG>A. Paperwork Burden Under section 9202(h) of Public Law 99-272, information required for purposesof implementation of the new section 1886(h) of the Act, as enacted byPublic Law 99-272, is not subject to the requirements of the PaperworkReduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. Chapter 35). Other provisions of thisfinal rule do not contain reporting requirements. Therefore, it is notnecessary that the rule be reviewed by the Office of Management and Budgetunder the latter Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">B. List of Subjects</ITAG>42 CFR Part 405 Administrative practice and procedure, Health facilities, Health professions,Kidney diseases, Laboratories, Medicare, Nursing homes, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Rural areas, X-rays.42 CFR Part 412 Health facilities, Medicare.42 CFR Part 413 Administrative practice and procedure, Health facilities, Health professions,Kidney diseases, Laboratories, Medicare, Nursing homes, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Rural areas, X-rays. 42 CFR chapter IV is amended as set forth below: A. Part 405, subpart E is amended as set forth below:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 405_FEDERAL HEALTH INSURANCE FOR THE AGED AND DISABLED</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart E_Criteria for Determination of Reasonable Charges; Reimbursementfor Services for Hospital Interns, Residents, and Supervisory Physicians</ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 405, subpart E continues to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 1102, 1814(b), 1832, 1833(a), 1842 (b) and (h),1861 (b) and (v), 1862(a)(14), 1866(a), 1871, 1881, 1886 and 1887 of theSocial Security Act as amended (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395f(b), 1395k, 1395l(a),1395u (b) and (h), 1395x (b) and (v), 1395y(a)(14), 1395cc(a), 1395hh,1395rr, 1395ww and 1395xx).</ITAG>2. In andSection; 405.521, the last sentence of paragraph (a) and the lasttwo sentences of paragraph (d)(1) are removed; at the end of the last sentenceof amended paragraph (d)(1) the phrase, ``as described in andSection; 413.86.''is inserted; paragraphs (d)(2) and (d)(3) are revised to read as follows;and in paragraph (e), the phrase ``health insurance'' is replaced withthe word ``Medicare'':<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 405.521 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Services of attending physicians supervising interns and residents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * * (2) For cost-reporting periods beginning after June 30, 1973, a hospitalwith an approved teaching program (see andSection; 405.522(a)) may electto receive reimbursement on a reasonable cost basis for the direct medicaland surgical services of its physicians in lieu of any payment on the basisof reasonable charges that might otherwise be payable for such services.A hospital may make this election to receive cost reimbursement only ifall physicians who furnish services in the hospital that are covered underMedicare agree not to bill charges for such services (or if all the physiciansare employees of the hospital and as a condition of employment they areprecluded from billing for such services). If the requirements of thisparagraph (d)(2) are satisfied by a hospital, the reimbursement provisionsof andSection; 405.465 are applicable. (3) For cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985, a teachinghospital that elects payment for the direct medical and surgical servicesof its physicians in accordance with paragraph (d)(2) of this section must,for purposes of calculating the per resident amounts described in andSection;413.86(e) of this chapter, remove from its graduate medical education baseperiod costs, as defined in andSection; 483.86(d) of this chapter, thosecosts relating to the supervision of interns and residents in approvedprograms related to the care of individual patients.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 405.522 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>3. In andSection; 405.522, the phrase ``Council on Medical Education'' inparagraph (a) is replaced by the phrase ``Accreditation Council for GraduateMedical Education''. B. Part 412, subpart H is amended as set forth below:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 412_PROSPECTIVE PAYMENT SYSTEM FOR INPATIENT HOSPITAL SERVICES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart H_Payments to Hospitals Under the Prospective Payment System</ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 412 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 1102, 1122, 1815(e), 1871, and 1886 of the SocialSecurity Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1320a-1, 1395g(e), 1395hh, and 1395ww).</ITAG>2. In andSection; 412.113, paragraph (b) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 412.113 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payments determined on a reasonable cost basis.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Direct medical education costs.</T3> (1) Payment for the direct medicaleducation costs of interns and residents in approved programs for costreporting periods beginning prior to July 1, 1985, and for approved educationactivities of nurses and paramedical health professionals is made as describedin andSection; 413.85 of this chapter. (2) For cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985, paymentfor the direct medical education costs of interns and residents in approvedprograms is made as described in andSection; 413.85 of this chapter. (3) Except as provided in andSection; 413.86(c)(1) of this chapter, for costreporting periods during the prospective payment transition period, thecosts of medical education must be determined in a manner that is consistentwith the treatment of these costs for purposes of determining the hospital-specificportion of the payment rate as provided in subpart E of this part. C. In part 413, subparts A, F, and H are amended as set forth below:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 413_PRINCIPLES OF REASONABLE COST REIMBURSEMENT; PAYMENT FOREND-STAGE RENAL DISEASE SERVICES </ITAG>A. The authority citation for part 413 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 1102, 1122, 1814(b), 1815, 1833(a), 1861(v),1871, 1881, and 1886 of the Social Security Act as amended (42 U.S.C. 1302,1320a-1, 1395f(b), 1395g, 1395l(a), 1395x(v), 1395hh, 1395rr and 1395ww).</ITAG>B. In subpart A, andSection; 413.13, the introductory text of paragraph (d)is republished; paragraphs (d)(3) and (d)(4) are revised; a new paragraph(d)(5) is added; the introductory text of paragraph (f)(2) is republished;and a new paragraph (f)(2)(iii)(C) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_Introduction and General Rules</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 413.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amount of payment if customary charges for services furnished areless than reasonable costs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) <T3>Exclusions from reasonable cost.</T3> For purposes of comparison withcustomary charges under this section, reasonable cost does not include_<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>(3) Amounts that result from a disposition of depreciable assets (andSection;413.134(f)), applicable to prior cost reporting periods; (4) Payments to funds for the donated services of teaching physicians (andSection;413.85); and (5) Graduate medical education costs for cost reporting periods beginningon or after July 1, 1985.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(f) <T3>Nominal charges. </T3>* * *(2) <T3>Cost reporting periods beginning on or after October 1, 1984. </T3>Forcost reporting periods beginning on or after October 1, 1984, the followingprovisions apply in determining nominal charges:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(iii) <T3>Determination of nominal charges in special situations.</T3> * * *(C) For cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985, graduatemedical education payments (or a provider's graduate medical educationreasonable costs if supported by appropriate data) are included in reasonablecosts when making the nominal charge determination.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>C. Subpart F is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Specific Categories of Costs</ITAG>1. In andSection; 413.85, paragraphs (a) and (e) are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 413.85 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cost of educational activities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Payment_</T3>(1) <T3>General rule. </T3>Except as provided in paragraph (a)(2) of this section,a provider's allowable cost may include its net cost of approved educationalactivities, as calculated under paragraph (g) of this section. The netcost is subject to apportionment based on Medicare utilization as describedin andSection; 413.50.(2) <T3>Exception. </T3>For cost reporting periods beginning on or after July1, 1985, payment to hospitals and hospital-based providers for approvedresidency programs in medicine, osteopathy, dentistry, and podiatry isdetermined as provided in andSection; 413.86.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) <T3>Approved programs. </T3>Recognized professional and paramedical educationaltraining programs now being conducted by provider institutions, and theirapproving bodies, include the following: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,7/8,g1,t1,i1,xs62,r20</C>  <H1>  </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">(1) Cytotechnology <D>Committee on Allied Health, Education, and Accreditation in collaborationwith the Board of Schools of Medical Technology, American Society of ClinicalPathologists.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(2) Dietetic internships <D>The American Dietetic Association.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(3) Hospital administration residencies <D>Accrediting Commission on Education in Health Services Administration.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(4) Inhalation therapy <D>Committee on Allied Health, Education, and Accreditation in collaborationwith the Board of Schools of Inhalation Therapy.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(5) Medical records <D>Committee on Allied Health, Education, and Accreditation in collaborationwith the Committee on Education and Registration of the American Associationof Medical Records Librarians.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(6) Medical technology <D>Committee on Allied Health, Education, and Accreditation in collaborationwith the Board of Schools of Medical Technology, American Society of ClinicalPathologists.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(7) Nurse anesthetists <D>The American Association of Nurse Anesthetists.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(8) Professional nursing <D>Approved by the respective State approving authorities. Reported forthe United States by the National League for Nursing.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(9) Practical nursing <D>Approved by the respective State approving authorities. Reported forthe United States by the National League for Nursing.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(10) Occupational Therapy <D>Committee on Allied Health, Education, and Accreditation in collaborationwith the Council on Education of the American Occupational Therapy Association.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(11) Pharmacy residencies <D>American Society of Hospital Pharmacists.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(12) Physical therapy <D>Committee on Allied Health, Education, and Accreditation in collaborationwith the American Physical Therapy Association.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(13) X-ray technology <D>Committee on Allied Health, Education, and Accreditation in collaborationwith the American College of Radiology.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>2. A new andSection; 413.86 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 413.86</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Direct graduate medical education payments.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Statutory basis and scope</T3>_(1) <T3>Basis.</T3> This section implements section 1886(h) of the Act by establishingthe methodology for Medicare payment of the cost of direct graduate medicaleducational activities.(2) <T3>Scope.</T3> This section applies to Medicare payments to hospitalsand hospital-based providers for the costs of approved residency programsin medicine, osteopathy, dentistry, and podiatry for cost reporting periodsbeginning on or after July 1, 1985.(b) <T3>Definitions.</T3> For purposes of this section, the following definitionsapply:<T3>``Approved geriatric program'' </T3>means a fellowship program of oneor more years in length that is approved by the Accreditation Council forGraduate Medical Education (ACGME) under the ACGME's criteria for geriatricfellowship programs in internal medicine and family practice.<T3>``Approved medical residency program''</T3> means a program that meetsone of the following criteria: (1) Is approved by one of the national organizations listed in andSection;405.522(a) of this chapter.(2) May count towards certification of the participant in a specialty orsubspecialty listed in the <T3>Directory of Residency Training Programs</T3> published by the AmericanMedical Association. (3) Is approved by the Accreditation Council For Graduate Medical Education(ACGME) as a fellowship program in geriatric medicine. <T3>``Base period'' </T3>means a cost reporting period that began on orafter October 1, 1983 but before October 1, 1984. <T3>``CPI_U'' </T3>stands for the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumersas compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics. <T3>``Foreign medical graduate''</T3> means a resident who is not a graduateof a medical, osteopathy, dental, or podiatry school, respectively, accreditedor approved as meeting the standards necessary for accreditation by oneof the following organizations: (1) The Liaison Committee on Medical Education of the American MedicalAssociation. (2) The American Osteopathic Association. (3) The Commission on Dental Accreditation. (4) The Council on Podiatric Medical Education. <T3>``FMGEMS''</T3> stands for the Foreign Medical Graduate Examinationin the Medical Sciences (Days I and II). <T3>``FTE''</T3> stands for full-time equivalent. <T3>``Medicare patient load''</T3> means, with respect to a hospital'scost reporting period, the total number of hospital inpatient days duringthe cost reporting period that are attributable to patients for whom paymentis made under Medicare Part A divided by total hospital inpatient days.In calculating inpatient days, inpatient days in any district part of thehospital furnishing a hospital level of care are included and nursery daysare excluded. <T3>``Resident''</T3> means an intern, resident, or fellow who participatesin an approved medical residency program, including programs in osteopathy,dentistry, and podiatry, as required in order to become certified by theappropriate specialty board.(c) <T3>Payment for graduate medical education costs_General rule. </T3>Beginningwith cost reporting periods starting on or after July 1, 1985, hospitals,including hospital-based providers, are paid for the costs of approvedgraduate medical education programs as described in paragraph (d) through(h) of this section. (d) <T3>Calculating payment for graduate medical education costs.</T3> A hospital'sMedicare payment for the costs of an approved residency program is calculatedas follows: (1) <T3>Step one.</T3> The hospital's updated per resident amount (as determinedunder paragraph (e) of this section) is multipled by the actual numberof FTE residents (as determined under paragraph (g) of this section). Thisresult is the aggregate approved amount for the cost reporting period.(2) <T3>Step two.</T3> The product derived in step one is multipled by thehospital's Medicare patient load. (3) <T3>Step three.</T3> The product derived in step two is apportioned betweenPart A and Part B of Medicare based on the ratio of Medicare's share ofreasonable costs excluding graduate medical education costs attributableto each part as determined through the Medicare cost report.(e) <T3>Determining per resident amounts for the base period</T3>_(1) <T3>For the base period. </T3>(i) Except as provided in paragraph (e)(4)of this section, the intermediary determines a base-period per residentamount for each hospital as follows:(A) Determine the allowable graduate medical education costs for the costreporting period beginning on or after October 1, 1983 but before October1, 1984. In determining these costs, graduate medical education costs allocatedto the nursery cost center, research and other nonreimbursable cost centers,and hospital-based providers that are not participating in Medicare areexcluded and graduate medical education costs allocated to distinct-parthospital units and hospital-based providers that participate in Medicareare included.(B) Divide the costs calculated in paragraph (e)(1)(i)(A) of this sectionby the average number of FTE residents working in all areas of the hospitalcomplex (including those areas whose costs were excluded under paragraph(e)(1)(i)(A) of this section) for its cost reporting period beginning onor after October 1, 1983 but before October 1, 1984.(ii) In determining the base-period per resident amount under paragraph(e)(1)(i) of this section, the intermediary_(A) Verifies the hospital's base-period graduate medical education costsand the hospital's average number of FTE residents; (B) Excludes from the base-period graduate medical education costs anynonallowable or misclassified costs, including those previously allowedunder andSection; 412.113(b)(3) of this chapter; and(C) Upon a hospital's request, includes graduate medical education coststhat were misclassified as operating costs during the hospital's prospectivepayment base year and were not allowable under andSection; 412.113(b)(3)of this chapter during the graduate medical education base period. Thesecosts may be included only if the hospital requests an adjustment of itsprospective payment hospital-specific rate or target amount as describedin paragraph (j)(2) of this section.(iii) If the hospital's cost report for its GME base period is no longersubject to reopening under andSection; 405.1885 of this chapter, the intermediarymay modify the hospital's base-period costs solely for purposes of computingthe per resident amount.(iv) If the intermediary modifies a hospital's base-period graduate medicaleducation costs as described in paragraph (e)(1)(ii)(B) of this section,the hospital may request an adjustment of its prospective payment hospital-specificrate or target amount as described in paragraph (j)(2) of this section.(v) The intermediary notifies each hospital that either had direct graduatemedical education coats or received indirect education payment in its costreporting period beginning on or after October 1, 1984 and before October1, 1985 of its base-period average per resident amount. A hospital mayappeal this amount within 180 days of the date of that notice.(2) <T3>For cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1985 and beforeJuly 1, 1986.</T3> For cost reporting periods beginning on or after July1, 1985 and before July 1, 1986, a hospital's base-period per residentamount is adjusted as follows:(i) If a hospital's base period began on or after October 1, 1983 and beforeJuly 1, 1984, the amount is adjusted by the percentage change in the CPI-Uthat occurred between the hospital's base period and the first cost reportingperiod to which the provisions of this section apply. The adjusted amountis then increased by one percent.(ii) If a hospital's base period began on or after July 1, 1984 and beforeOctober 1, 1984, the amount is increased by one percent.(3) <T3>For cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1986.</T3>For cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 1986, each hospital'sper resident amount for the previous cost reporting period is adjustedby the projected change in the CPI-U for the 12-month cost reporting period.This adjustment is subject to revision during the settlement of the costreport to reflect actual changes in the CPI-U that occurred during thecost reporting period.(4) <T3>Exceptions</T3>_(i) <T3>Base period for certain hospitals.</T3> If a hospital did not haveany approved medical residency training programs or did not participatein Medicare during the base period, but either condition changes in a costreporting period beginning on or after July 1, 1985, the intermediary establishesa per resident amount for the hospital using the information from the firstcost reporting period during which the hospital participates in Medicareand the residents are on duty during the first month of that period. Anygraduate medical education program costs incurred by the hospital beforethat cost reporting period are reimbursed on a reasonable cost basis. Theper resident amount is based on the lower of the following:(A) The hospital's actual costs, incurred in connection with the graduatemedical education program for the hospital's first cost reporting periodin which residents were on duty during the first month of the cost reportingperiod.(B) The mean value of per resident amounts of hospitals located in thesame geographic wage area, as that term is used in the prospective paymentsystem under Part 412 of this chapter, for cost reporting periods beginningin the same fiscal years. If there are fewer than three amounts that canbe used to calculate the mean value, the intermediary must contact HCFACentral Office for a determination of the appropriate amount to use.(ii) <T3>Short or long base-period cost reporting periods.</T3> If a hospital'sbase-period cost reporting period reflects graduate medical education costsfor a period that is shorter than 50 weeks or longer than 54 weeks, theintermediary converts the allowable costs for the base period into a dailyfigure. The daily figure is then multiplied by 365 or 366, as appropriate,to derive the approved per resident amount for a 12-month base-period costreporting period. If a hospital has two cost reporting periods beginningin the base period, the later period serves as the base-period cost reportingperiod.(iii) <T3>Short or long cost reporting periods beginning on or after July 1,1985. </T3>If a hospital's cost reporting period is shorter than 50 weeksor longer than 54 weeks, the hospital's intermediary should contact HCFACentral Office to receive a special CPI-U adjustment factor.(f) <T3>Determining the total number of FTE residents. </T3>(1) Subject tothe weighting factors in paragraphs (g) and (h) of this section, the countof FTE residents is determined as follows:(i) Residents in an approved program working in all areas of the hospitalcomplex may be counted.(ii) No individual may be counted as more than one FTE. If a resident spendstime in more than one hospital or, except as provided in paragraph (f)(1)(iii)of this section, in a nonprovider setting, the resident counts as a partialFTE based on the proportion of time worked at the hospital to the totaltime worked. A part-time resident counts as a partial FTE based on theproportion of time worked as compared to the average time spent by otherresidents working in the same specialty program.(iii) On or after July 1, 1987, the time residents spend in nonprovidersettings such as freestanding clinics, nursing homes, and physicians' officesin connection with approved programs is not excluded in determining thenumber of FTE residents in the calculation of a hospital's resident countif the following conditions are met:(A) The resident spends his or her time in patient care activities.(B) There is a written agreement between the hospital and the outside entitythat states that the resident's compensation for training time spent outsideof the hospital setting is to be paid by the hospital.(2) To include a resident in the FTE count for a particular cost reportingperiod, the hospital must furnish the following information.The information must be certified by an official of the hospital and, ifdifferent, an official responsible for administering the residency program.(i) The name and social security number of the resident.(ii) The type of residency program in which the individual participatesand the number of years the resident has completed in all types of residencyprograms.(iii) The dates the resident is assigned to the hospital and any hospital-basedproviders.(iv) The dates the resident is assigned to other hospitals, or other freestandingproviders, and any nonprovider setting during the cost reporting period,if any.(v) The name of the medical, osteopathic, dental, or podiatric school fromwhich the resident graduated and the date of graduation.(vi) If the resident is an FMG, documentation concerning whether the residenthas satisfied the requirements of paragraph (h) of this section.(vii) The name of the employer paying the resident's salary.(g) <T3>Determining the weighted number of FTE residents. </T3>Subject to theprovisions in paragraph (h) of this section, HCFA determines a hospital'snumber of FTE residents by applying a weighting factor to each residentand then summing the resulting numbers that represent each resident. Theweighting factor is determined as follows:(1) For purposes of this section, an initial residency period is the numberof years necessary to satisfy the minimum requirements for certificationin a specialty or subspecialty, plus one year. An initial residency periodmay not exceed five years in order to be counted toward determining FTEstatus except in the case of fellows in an approved geriatric program whoseinitial residency period may last up to two additional years.(i) For residency programs other than those specified in paragraphs (g)(1)(ii)and (g)(1)(iii) of this section, the initial residency period is the minimumnumber of years of formal training necessary to satisfy the requirementsfor initial board eligibility in the particular specialty for which theresident is training, as specified in the 1985-1986 Directory of ResidencyTraining Programs.(ii) For residency programs in osteopathy, dentistry, and podiatry, theminimum requirement for certification in a specialty or subspecialty isthe minimum number of years of formal training necessary to satisfy therequirements of the appropriate approving body listed in andSection; 405.522(a)of this chapter.(iii) For residency programs in geriatric medicine approved by the ACGME,as set forth in later editions of the directory specified in paragraph(g)(1)(ii) of this section, these programs are considered approved programsretroactively to the latter of_(A) The starting date of the program within a hospital; or(B) The hospital's costs reporting period beginning on or after July 1,1985. (iv) The time spent in residency programs that do not lead to certificationin a specialty or subspecialty, but that otherwise meet the definitionof approved programs, as described in paragraph (b) of this section, iscounted toward the initial residency period limitation.(2) If the resident is in an initial residency period, the weighting factoris one.(3) If the resident is not in an initial residency period, the weightingfactor is 1.00 during the period beginning on or after July 1, 1985 andbefore July 1, 1986, .75 during the period beginning on or after July 1,1986 and before July 1, 1987 and is .50 thereafter without regard to thehospital's cost reporting period.(h) <T3>Determination of weighting factors for foreign medical graduates.</T3>(1) The weighting factor for a foreign medical graduate is determined underthe provisions of paragraph (g) of this section if the foreign medicalgraduate_(i) Has passed FMGEMS; or(ii) Before July 1, 1986, received certification from, or passed an examinationof, the Educational Committee for Foreign Medical Graduates.(2) Before July 1, 1986, the weighting factor for a foreign medical graduateis 1.0 times the weight determined under the provisions of paragraph (g)of this section. On or before July 1, 1986 and before July 1, 1987, theweighting factor who does not meet the requirements set forth in paragraph(h)(1) of this section is .50 times the weight determined under the provisionsof paragraph (g) of this section.(3) On or after July 1, 1987, these foreign medical graduates are not countedin determining the number of FTE residents.(4) During the cost reporting period in which a foreign medical graduatepasses FMGEMS, the weighting factor for that resident is determined underthe provisions of paragraph (g) of this section for the part of the costreporting period beginning with the month the resident passes the test.(5) On or after September 1, 1989, the National Board of Medical ExaminersExamination, Parts I and II, may be substituted for FMGEMS for purposesof the determination made under paragraphs (h)(1) and (h)(4) of this section.(i) <T3>Special rules for States that formerly had a waiver from Medicare reimbursementprinciples.</T3> (1) Effective for cost reporting periods beginning onor after Janaury 1, 1986, hospitals in States that, prior to becoming subjectto the prospective payment system, had a waiver for the operation of aState reimbursement control system under section 1886(c) of the Act, section402 of the Social Security Amendments of 1967 (42 U.S.C. 1395b-1 or section222(a) of the Social Security Amendment of 1972 (42 U.S.C. 1395b-1 (note))are permitted to change the order in which they allocate administrativeand general costs to the order specified in the instructions for the Medicarecost report.(2) For hospitals making this election, the base-period costs for the purposeof determining the per resident amount are adjusted to take into accountthe change in the order by which they allocate administrative and generalcosts to interns and residents in approved program cost centers.(3) Per resident amounts are determined for the base period and updatedas described in paragraph (e) of this section. For cost reporting periodsbeginning on or after January 1, 1986, payment is made based on the methodologydescribed in paragraph (d) of this section.(j) <T3>Adjustment of a hospital's target amount or prospective payment hospital-specificrate</T3>_(1) <T3>Misclassified operating costs_</T3>(i) <T3>General rule.</T3> If a hospital has its base-period graduate medicaleducation costs reduced under paragraph (e)(1) of this section becausethose costs included misclassified operating costs, the hospital may requestthat the intermediary review the classification of the affected costs inits rate-of-increase ceiling or prospective payment base year for purposesof adjusting the hospital's target amount or hospital-specific rate. Forthose cost reports that are not subject to reopening under andSection; 405.1885of this chapter, the hospital's reopening request must explicitly statethat the review is limited to this one issue.(ii) <T3>Request for review.</T3> The hospital must request review of the classificationof its rate of increase ceiling or prospective payment base year costsno later than 180 days after the date of the notice by the intermediaryof the hospital's base-period average per resident amount. A hospital'srequest for review must include sufficient documentation to demonstrateto the intermediary that adjustment of the hospital's hospital-specificrate or target amount is warranted.(iii) <T3>Effect of intermediary's review. </T3>If the intermediary, upon reviewof the hospital's costs, determines that the hospital's hospital-specificrate or target amount should be adjusted, the adjustment of the hospital-specificrate or the target amount is effective for the hospital's cost reportingperiods subject to the prospective payment system or the rate-of-increaseceiling that are still subject to reopening under andSection; 405.1885 ofthis chapter.(2) <T3>Misclassification of graduate medical education costs</T3>_(i) <T3>General rule.</T3> If costs that should have been classified as graduatemedical education costs were treated as operating costs during both thegraduate medical education base period and the rate-of-increase ceilingbase year or prospective payment base year and the hospital wishes to receivebenefit for the appropriate classification of these costs as graduate medicaleducation costs in the graduate medical education base period, the hospitalmust request that the intermediary review the classification of the affectedcosts in the rate-of-increase ceiling or prospective payment base yearfor purposes of adjusting the hospital's target amount or hospital-specificrate. For those cost reports that are not subject to reopening under andSection;405.1885 of this chapter, the hospital's reopening request must explicitlystate that the review is limited to this one issue.(ii) <T3>Request for review.</T3> The hospital must request review of the classificationof its costs no later than 180 days after the date of the intermediary'snotice of the hospital's base-period average per resident amount. A hospital'srequest for review must include sufficient documentation to demonstrateto the intermediary that modification of the adjustment of the hospital'shospital-specific rate or target amount is warranted.(iii) <T3>Effect of intermediary's review.</T3> If the intermediary, upon reviewof the hospital's costs, determines that the hospital's hospital-specificrate or target amount should be adjusted, the adjustment of the hospital-specificrate and the adjustment of the target amount is effective for the hospital'scost reporting periods subject to the prospective payment system or therate-of-increase ceiling that are still subject to reopening under andSection;405.1885of this chapter.D. Subpart H is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart H_Payment for End-Stage Renal Disease (ESRD) Services</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;413.170 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>In andSection;413.170, paragraph (g)(3) is removed and reserved.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance program No. 13.773, Medicare-HospitalInsurance)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 20, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Louis B. Hays, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Administrator, Health Care Financing Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: September 25, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Louis W. Sullivan, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Editorial Note:</T4> The following Appendix will not appear in theCode of Federal Regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s20,8</C><T4>Table </T4>1a._<T4>Update Factors for Cost Reporting Periods Beginning on or After July</T4>1, 1985 <T4>and Before July </T4> 1, 1988<H1>Cost reporting period</H1><H1>Update factor \1\</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">7/1/85 to 6/30/86<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8/1/85 to 7/31/86<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9/1/85 to 8/31/86<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10/1/85 to 9/30/86<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">11/1/85 to 10/31/86<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">12/1/85 to 11/30/86<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1/1/86 to 12/31/86<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2/1/86 to 1/31/87<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3/1/86 to 2/28/87<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4/1/86 to 3/31/87<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5/1/86 to 4/30/87<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6/1/86 to 5/31/87<D>1.0100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7/1/86 to 6/30/87<D>1.0146</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8/1/86 to 7/31/87<D>1.0210</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9/1/86 to 8/31/87<D>1.0303</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10/1/86 to 9/30/87<D>1.0378</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">11/1/86 to 10/31/87<D>1.0386</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">12/1/86 to 11/30/87<D>1.0365</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1/1/87 to 12/31/87<D>1.0393</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2/1/87 to 1/31/88<D>1.0428</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3/1/87 to 2/29/88<D>1.0436</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4/1/87 to 3/31/88<D>1.0453</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5/1/87 to 4/30/88<D>1.0453</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6/1/87 to 5/31/88<D>1.0443</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7/1/87 to 6/30/88<D>1.0405</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8/1/87 to 7/31/88<D>1.0394</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9/1/87 to 8/31/88<D>1.0393</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10/1/87 to 9/30/88<D>1.0390</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">11/1/87 to 10/31/88<D>1.0389</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">12/1/87 to 11/30/88<D>1.0397</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1/1/88 to 12/31/88<D>1.0413</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2/1/88 to 1/31/89<D>1.0402</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3/1/88 to 2/28/89<D>1.0417</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4/1/88 to 3/31/89<D>1.0425</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5/1/88 to 4/30/89<D>1.0425</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6/1/88 to 5/30/89<D>1.0442</D><F>\1\ The update factor for a specified cost reporting period is appliedto the prior period's per resident amount and, for cost reporting periodsbeginning on or after July 1, 1986, accounts for the 12-month average changein the CPI-U ending at the midpoint of the specified cost reporting period.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s20,8 </C><T4>Table </T4>1b._<T4>Projected Update Factors for Cost Reporting Periods Beginning on orAfter July </T4>1, 1988, <T4>To Be Used for Interim Payment Purposes Only </T4><H1>Cost reporting period </H1><H1>Updated factor \1\</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">7/1/88 to 6/30/89 <D>1.0416 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8/1/88 to 7/31/89 <D>1.0416 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9/1/88 to 8/31/89 <D>1.0416 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10/1/88 to 9/30/89 <D>1.0436 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">11/1/88 to 10/31/89 <D>1.0436 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">12/1/88 to 11/30/89 <D>1.0436 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1/1/89 to 12/31/89 <D>1.0453 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2/1/89 to 1/31/90 <D>1.0453 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3/1/89 to 2/28/90 <D>1.0453 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4/1/89 to 3/31/90 <D>1.0465 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5/1/89 to 4/30/90 <D>1.0465 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6/1/89 to 5/31/90 <D>1.0465 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7/1/89 to 6/30/90 <D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8/1/89 to 7/31/90 <D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9/1/89 to 8/31/90 <D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10/1/89 to 9/30/90 <D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">11/1/89 to 10/31/90 <D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">12/1/89 to 11/30/90 <D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1/1/90 to 12/31/90 <D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2/1/90 to 1/31/91 <D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3/1/90 to 2/28/91 <D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4/1/90 to 3/31/91 <D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5/1/90 to 4/30/91 <D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6/1/90 to 5/31/91 <D> </D><F>\1\ The projected update factor for a specified cost reporting periodis to be used for interim payment purposes only and is applied to the priorperiod's per resident amount. The actual update factor will be publishedin a future notice and is to be used for final settlement purposes. Theprojected update factors are based on estimates prepared for HCFA by DataResources, Inc. on a quarterly basis. The forecasted percent changes inthe CPI-U over the previous 12-month period serve as the proxy behind theAll Other NonLabor Intensive portion of the hospital input price indexused in the Medicare prospective payment system.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>2a._<T4>Initial Residency Period Limitations Effective July </T4>1, 1985 <T4>Through June </T4>30, 1989<H1>Specialities</H1><H1>Initial residency period</H1><ITAG tagnum="21"> <T2>Medicine </T2></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Allergy andamp; Immunology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Diagnostic Laboratory Immunology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Anesthesiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Colon and Rectal Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dermatology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Dermatopathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Emergency Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Family Practice<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Internal Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Cardiology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Endocrinology and Metabolism<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Gastroenterology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Hematology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Infectious Disease<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Medical Oncology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Nephrology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pulmonary Disease<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Rheumatology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Neurological Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nuclear Medicine<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Obstetrics and Gynecology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ophthamology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Orthopaedic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Otolaryngology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Blood Banking<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Chemical Pathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Dermatopathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Forensic Pathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Hematology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Immunopathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Medical Microbiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Neuropathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Radioisotopic Pathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pediatrics<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pediatric Cardiology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pediatric Endocrinology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pediatric Hematology-Oncology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pediatric Nephrology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Neonatal-Perinatal Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Physical Medicine/Rehabilitation<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Plastic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Preventive Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Psychiatry and Neurology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Child Psychiatry<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Nuclear Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">General Vascular Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pediatric Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Thoracic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Urology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Osteopathy</T2></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Aerospace Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Anesthesiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Angiography and Interventional Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cardiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Clinical Allergy and Immunology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dermatology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diagnostic Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Osteopathic Manipulative Medicine<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Emergency Medicine<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Endocrinology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gastroenterology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">General Practice<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">General Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">General Vascular Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hematology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hematology/Oncology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Infectious Diseases<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Internal Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical Diseases of the Chest<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Neonatal Medicine<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nephrology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Neurology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Neuroradiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Neurosurgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nuclear Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nuclear Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Obstetrics_Gynecology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Obstetrics andamp; Gynecological Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Occupational Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oncology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ophthalmology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Orthopedic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Otorhinolaryngology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Otorhinolaryngology/Oro-Facial Plastic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pathology, Anatomical<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pediatrics<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Plastic and Reconstructive Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Proctology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Psychiatry, General and Child<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Public Health and Preventive Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Radiation Oncology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Radiological Imaging<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rehabilitation Medicine<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Reproductive Endocrinology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rheumatology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Thoracic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Urological Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Podiatry</T2></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rotating Podiatric Residency<D>2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Podiatric Orthopedic Residency<D>2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Podiatric Surgical Residency<D>2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Dentistry</T2></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dental Public Health<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Endodontics<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oral Pathology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Orthodontics<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pediatric Dentistry<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Periodontics<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Prosthodontics<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Prosthodontics Maxillofacial<D>4</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>2b._<T4>Initial Residency Period Limitations Effective July </T4>1, 1989 \1\<H1>Specialities</H1><H1>Initial residency period</H1><ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Medicine </T2></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Allergy andamp; Immunology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Diagnostic Laboratory Immunology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Anesthesiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Critical Care Medicine<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Colon and Rectal Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dermatology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Dermatopathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Emergency Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Family Practice<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Internal Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Cardiology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Critical Care Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Endocrinology and Metabolism<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Gastroenterology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Hematology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Infectious Disease<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Medicine Oncology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Nephrology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pulmonary Disease<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Rheumatology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Neurological Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nuclear Medicine<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Obstetrics and Gynecology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ophthalmology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Orthopaedic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Otolaryngology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Blood Banking<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Chemical Pathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Dermatopathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Forensic Pathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Hematology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Immunopathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Medicine Microbiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Neuropathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Radioisotopic Pathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pediatrics<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pediatric Cardiology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pediatric Endocrinology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pediatric Hematology-Oncology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pediatric Nephrology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Neonatal-Perinatal Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Physical Medicine/Rehabilitation<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Plastic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Preventive Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Psychiatry and Neurology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Child Psychiatry<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Nuclear Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Critical Care Medicine<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">General Vascular Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Pediatric Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Thoracic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Urology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Osteopathy</T2></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Aerospace Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Anesthesiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Angiography and Interventional Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cardiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Clinical Allergy and Immunology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dermatology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diagnostic Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Osteopathic Manipulative Medicine<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Emergency Medicine<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Endocrinology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gastroenterology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">General Practice<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">General Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">General Vascular Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hematology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hematology/Oncology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Infectious Diseases<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Internal Medicine<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical Diseases of the Chest<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Neonatal Medicine<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nephrology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Neurology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Neuroradiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Neurosurgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nuclear Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nuclear Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Obstetrics_Gynecology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Obstetrics and Gynecological Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Occupational Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oncology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ophthalmology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Orthopedic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Otorhinolaryngology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Otorhinolaryngology/Oro-Facial Plastic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pathology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pathology, Anatomical<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pediatrics<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Plastic and Reconstructive Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Proctology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Psychiatry, General and Child<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Public Health and Preventive Medicine<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Radiation Oncology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Radiological Imaging<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Radiology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rehabilitation Medicine<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Reproductive Endocrinology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rheumatology<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Thoracic Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Urological Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Podiatry</T2></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rotating Podiatric Residency<D>2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Podiatric Orthopedic Residency<D>2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Podiatric Surgical Residency<D>2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Dentistry</T2></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dental Public Health<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Endodontics<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oral Pathology<D>4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Orthodontics<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pediatric Dentistry<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Periodontics<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Prosthodontics<D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Prosthodontics Maxillofacial<D>4</D><F>\1\ The changes from Table 2a, which applies to cost reporting periodsbeginning on or after July 1, 1985, through June 30, 1989, are as follows:Critical Care Medicine is added as a subspecialty in three specialties_Anesthesiology(5), Cardiology (4), and Surgery (5); Osteopathic programs in EmergencyMedicine are increased to 5; Osteopathic programs in General Practice areincreased to 4; and Dentistry programs in Oral and Maxillofacial Surgeryare increased to 5 years beginning July 1, 1989.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-23026 Filed 9-28-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4120-03-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>